Sometimes doing speedwork can feel like a chore. You know it will help but sometimes it's so miserable while you're doing it. Last night's workout didn't feel that way. Although, my quads were pretty trashed when I got on my bike to go home. Fingers crossed I feel better on Sunday! I've got another duathlon to do!
Mom is not a fan of drums.
Of all things I've talked about in this series, this is the one that I find the scariest. I think we're closer to realizing this one than many of the others. And, more than any of the others, this is the one into which we will go voluntarily.
Of course that’s what Mother wanted all along. Damn her.
We skipped all of the demonstrations / panels as seating was all out in the open with the sun directly overhead. It was difficult to enjoy the event overall as we felt overheated and dehydrated most of the day, between standing in long lines, weaving our way through crowds and trying to sample as much alcohol as we could handle to get our money's worth.
Increasing store with loss, and loss with store;
Funkateers - Bernie Worrell, Bootsy Collins, Gary Shider, George Clinton, Gary ‘Mudbone’ Cooper, Maceo Parker, Eddie Hazel...
However, there is no encumbrance to them doing so. If they made us an offer at a price that reflected the value and potential return of the site, then we would, of course, consider it. But as it stands, it is our intention to continue with our development.'
Runners Up: Graeme Coates with Red Sparrowhawk (this also won a few awards at the Bristol competition in September) and Ingemar Jansson with Slinka IPA. Ingemar is one of a pair of Swedish homebrewers who came over for the competition and a London beery weekend. It was great to meet you guys.
climbing up my body like a tree
First Floor Community Room
Most of those silly meetings go away.
So let me back up for a second. I'm sure you're wondering how I was able to get Mt. Tom's ice cream on the Weather Channel in the first place. I wish it was a more gripping story, still, given the odds of landing such a market coup, I may never know the extent of synchronicity involved in my getting the call.
Bluegrass Brewing Company Horse Piss Beer
We’re not really having anyone help us. The packing is going a lot better than I thought it would, and The Agent is so anal with moving that he would rather do it all himself than to have to tell someone else how it HAS to be done. He might get his cousin’s husband to help him with the really heavy stuff, but otherwise The Agent is a solo worker.
This is the second attempt at making these. The first time I used a sugar cookie recipe. The fingers came out looking like they belonged to a witch who ate too many bad little boys and girls if you know what I mean. They were tasty, but I wanted my witch fingers looking near death and skeletal. I needed a recipe that called for no leavening agents...shortbread cookies were perfect. I can't say that I've ever tasted real witch's fingers, but I'm fairly certain they would not taste as good as these.
Historic 18th century priory set in its own 8,000m2 (2 acres) park in a small village. 8 bedrooms, each with ensuite, large kitchen, scullery and landry room, and 2 salons with views over the garden. Also comes with attractive outbuildings, including stone built barns, two of which have recently been re-roofed, which could provide further development potential. €655,500 Euros / $A830,000.
I am looking into using an editor for The Rat King, book two of the Changers Trilogy/
That explains why so many English spoken shows are narrated in Spanish. US shows are generally the most watched shows; it’s totally normal to record them in English. The question is; would it work the other way? For countries where English is the second language, it would not matter that much: all shows have subtitles anyway. Trust me; people are happy to follow TV shows in their own language. They automatically read the subtitles. But for countries who have Spanish as an official language, it would be very nice.
You see, I work in an elementary school, and our students are of the age when it's a complete delight to reflect on God's goodness by celebrating the first Thanksgiving in American history.
The issue came when the recommendations were given, and only the percentage of complaints and issues were addressed. Someone didn’t do the math. If you have a 5% complaint rate for in-person reps, but you have 1000 reps, but a 50% complaint rate for 100 docs using an online tool, which one has the bigger problem and should be addressed first? If you’re a stats person without time to think, you say the big old negative one, the 50% problem one. If you have a brain, you say, uh, the rep one, because while both net out at 50 complaints, the rep has a higher chance of pissing people off long term, a higher rate of conversion when done correctly, and 100 docs on an online app doesn’t make for a decent pool for stats.
In some sense it is of course ironic that the revolution, war, murder and oppression that American money brought to our shores to destroy our great nation is finally arriving back to it's own coop.
mixture of revlon photoready/neutrogena healthy skin foundation, mac msfn, cargo med matte bronzer, mac posey cream blush, rock&republic blush in x-rated, mac vanilla pigment for highlight.
To my great surprise, I spied some Noritake stoneware, simply lovely stuff. Microwave safe. Dishwasher safe. Beautiful design. Mint condition.
1) Central A/C
if you aren't already obsessed with the "drive" soundtrack, prepare to become obsessed. "drive" was a film you either loved or hated and i my friends, loved the movie. loved the colors, ryan gosling, the artsy feel, ryan gosling, the music and of course...ryan gosling.
Alternatively you can microwave it in a microwave safe bowl. Stir after every 3 mins and take care it does not run over. When the mixture is little thick, add the crushed cardamoms and Saffron and follow the above steps to cool and cut.
Oh, it starts out well. Artiguez sneaks into San Martin, climbs up a rooftop, aims his sniper rifle and locates Vinolas in his sights. Then he takes aim… only to shoot Carlos instead. It’s a truly crummy anticlimax—although Zinnemann, at the time, went to great pains to defend it. “In my opinion,” he told reporters, “Manuel, when faced with the choice of killing a lifelong enemy or somebody who he considers a traitor, would kill the traitor. Perhaps in some way his enemy is an honorable adversary, but a traitor is like vermin.”
SAME
I’m not even going to touch the bubble bath thing, seeing as those e-mails go right into the same spam folder as the links from random succubus web sites and fake letters from tolvir princes offering to pay me a fortune to help them sneak money into an account in Kalimdor and oh by the way all it will take is a small deposit up front on my part. But really, you guys have got to calm down. Sylvanas is not still screwing around with the blog, she’s not in my e-mail, you can all stop being so frigging paranoid. Like I said, Spazzle has already handled that shit, so we shouldn’t be having any more trouble. Everybody just needs to chill the fuck out and stop being a bunch of Chicken Littles. The sky is not fucking falling, okay?
expressing displeasure with his on board suite, billionaire Tony Stark, also known as Avenger Iron Man, has bought the Titanic--and sunk it. You heard it here first, ladies and gentlemen. There was no iceberg. Oh, and Stark reportedly referred to the journeyman artist Jack Dawson as a yellow bellied
but his eyes were dead pools of black as he walked right through her circle.
Without thinking at all about the strangeness of the mode of coding, we played the record, Patti Smith, Wave.
The second example is that of Saul of Tarsus and for this we look at Acts 9:6. Paul had just confronted Jesus Christ and “he trembling and astonished said, Lord, what wilt thou have me to do? And the Lord said unto him, Arise, and go into the city, and it shall be told thee what thou must do.” Again it was a trial of his faith.
These are just some of the products I have been using from them recently and that Im loving! I also have a soothing oatmeal mask I have yet to try, and a makeup remover that I use everyday. It seems to be a blend of different oils and gets rid of makeup so easily and leaves my tender eye area soft.
I want to run into you at the market
I think that this was a rather good thing which made me less self-conscious as a writer. I’m particularly thankful that I never discovered Gillian Philip’s Crossing the Line before I got a publishing deal - it’s so good, that I fear I may never have written another word.
Friends of friends are all sooooo NICE and SOOO CUTE and soooo funny and sooooo smart! Except, that is, when they're not. Not that I don't beg my friends to set me up with their own rejections (if they are a woman) or competition (if they are a man) all the time, but still, we should really know what we are getting ourselves into.
Arab and Africa Research Center, Egypt; Institute for Black Research, South Africa;
Anyways, you’ll lose! So get it into your head – your own face is cute enough to present you on social net.
Thanks so much for stoppin' by!!
Edit: My boyfriend also recently finished the design of two great restuarants in the same building - Cantopop and Linguini Fini which are in the L Place (139 Queens Road Central).
Before delivering his address to the nation, Obama spoke to U.S. troops stationed at Bagram Air Base.
Bachmann: I’m not looking at my rear view
He creates a generic look across his photos with use of lighting and backdrops. In these ones he stretches our imagination of different situations that various celebrities could be in, Suiting each celebrity to different exaggerated poses and dramatic colors schemes. The photographs become funny and they each tell a very interesting 'story'.
Kenny West (REP) 7.77% 351
Artwork by Acrosome
You buy two you get charged for it.
I had a feeling before this happened that this was coming and had made a start on some of my DT cards. As such I have one for you today and once for you later in the week. I am taking a short break from my cards but promise I will be back soon. Currently I look at my crafting stuff and think blah.....I know this will change again soon.
The Cobble Hill Association stands firmly by the opinion... NO! We want NO additional housing built in the Park and urge the committee to consider any of the many other revenue raising ideas such as potential revenues from the sale of the Watchtower buildings, more concessions, including food and fine dining, and fee-based recreational facilities. A park with housing is simply someone's nice backyard. We want to see a park that is the equal and open backyard for ALL of Brooklyn.
Attending Festivals as part of audience
Tomorrows another day right?
1 versatile
Goodbye old friend. We shall not see your like again.
Hello everyone.. wow we had lots of last minute Christmas entries last week and i had a real time choosing a winner and top 3 - so to be fair i used Random.org .
14. What was your favorite TV program?
Does anyone find the idea of the ice cream truck just that much disturbing? I mean, come on...you're buying FOOD from a stranger. Not only is he a stranger, but he's a stranger luring your kid to his scary child molester van with sweets. What, so we tell the kids never to accept food from strangers except the greasy weirdo behind the wheel of a rolling Kid Snatcher? "Don't even worry about him kids, I'm sure he's a very nice man who just happens to get his kicks from enticing your sweet little faces as close as possible to the open door of his van while playing Disney music and waving ice cream around. I'm sure he's juuussst fine."
Peter Straub – Mr. Clubb And Mr. Cuff
So that was why Ju-Ju had to get over
For those of you who did not win, THANK you for participating! We really appreciate your support!! Please don't hesitate to buy one of your own coloring books or crayon rolls! YOU are NEVER too old to color!! Plus, they make wonderful gifts and many parents have noted that their children have been kept busy for hours with these wonderful little coloring books. It's a creative outlet!
But with Baker peacefully napping, Gray wrapped up in his blanket reading, and Max lying quietly on the couch watching a movie, I think I can at least sneak in this one thing I'd hoped to do today--update my acquisitions and blame. All but the bottom book in this stack were bought in one evening (nearly two weeks ago) in the used section of B&N.
Alongside the emaciated prisoners there were security guards who lived extravagantly, drinking beer every week: privileges unknown in other ANC establishments.
Many employers now don't use the jobcentre, they use recruitment agencies instead. While this may seem logical, it makes it a bit of a nightmare for the jobhunter.
This happened recently again with this person, only on a different subject. He/she wanted to do everything he/she could to prove I was wrong. Really? Needless to say, I was hurt and I couldn't understand at the moment why this person had to make me feel so terrible to be "right" in these situations. I dropped the subject again.
BONUS! It’s YOUR cooperative! YOU own the business!
Research one of these topics from the novel: English history, Robin Hood, The Knights Templar, Scottish clan history, Holy Grail, the crusades, medicine in the middle ages, etc.
Konnichiwa (kor nee chi wah)
Winsor has given up and now just shits in a box. Which also happens to be in the same place as my studio.
I had a few posts set to go up while I was gone, but for the most part it's been quiet around here. I haven't even gotten on to read any blog posts from bloggy friends.
Khedira: 4
Very respectfully,
'The African snails, which are able to live for up to seven years, will also help to test the influence of possible accumulating substances over a long period,' said Sergei Kholodkevich, an ecological researcher who dreamt up the idea of using the creatures.
G’night all
We’ll be fine.
Add the flour and cook for about a minute.
Objection #3 – But I don’t need a priest, I can go directly to God and ask forgiveness.
(For the non-Jews in the room, substitute Easter for Passover. Same idea).
Once we have established this link to our inner worlds we may have an opportunity to meet an inner guide, such as the one described in Gabriel’s book, Trail of Immortality. A guide such as this can help us see more love and beauty in life. We can then ask to be shown a glimpse of God if we are ready and able to withstand exposure to such a powerful source of love. When the student is ready the master will appear.
Intelligent. Learning is so much fun and you could learn every day of your life and still be something you don't know. I want my kids to like to learn and to crave learning new things. I want them to go to college and get a degree, even multiple degrees if that is what they desire. They are smart and they can do so much.
The skirt is actually very dark blue but in the photo it looks black. To accessorise I chose the oversize red belt, Hospice shop ($1), red tights (retail), bangles (all thrifted) and black ring which was a 40th Birthday present from my dear work colleague Sonya.
Also I missed a call this morning to meet with someone about advertising, but now I feel it’s so late that I might as well call tomorrow and setup something because I’m just too tired to actually talk on the phone. Email is so much easier on me.
They have been observing the “rulers” with great envy from distance during their power grabbing period, now they started to copy their lives but their starving minds lost control over proportions and they turned the forest into a forest of nightmares, they invited greedy animals from all over the neighbourhood and banished the actual residents of the forest so to make home for their mercenaries. They forced the residents of the forest to live like their slaves, acting as per their whim and fancy. No animal was safe in the forest unless they were working for them.
Eamon called and told me that he ran into old man Ravosa downtown, who complained to him that Peter Picknelly screwed him out of a half million dollars in the sale of his property. Eamon also recalled that Mayor Ryan said he would do the library takeover advocacy work for free, but then privately asked Bob and Karen Powell to have fundraisers at their house to raise money to pay for Ryan's legal work. Eamon claims that Tony Gill, the black guy from AIC who used to work for Boston's Ray Flynn, asked if Eamon could help him get a job with the Ryan Administration. Gill has Tom Devine on his radio show a lot.
Anyway, (totally my favourite word) hopefully I won’t be here for the sequel title.
Meg shook her head emphatically. “We’ll keep a lookout while we dig it up. We have to see what it is.”
A Damon quote to enjoy: All of these are in speaking with Jeremy: “Dead vampire is redundant, but yes.” And my favorite: “Well didn’t you find it weird that you made a friend so fast? Have you met you?” Amen. And finally: “Alright Whoopi, what do you need? Candles incense, pottery wheel?” Oh, Damon.
Meyer ED, et al. Occupational risk for primary cytomegalovirus infection among paediatric health care workers. N Engl J Med 1983; 309: 950-953.
I AM mom enough for Toph.
A small face and soft hair
The way she loved God. It was contagious.
One of my best blogger buddies and a fellow Challenge Co-Host, Jeremy Hawkins of Retro Zombie’, had some exciting news – He’s officially been added to an independent record label called "Howlin' Wolf Records" to run their on-line magazine. Congratulations, Jeremy – you rock, dude!
Paranormal Romance
Till soon,
MADRID—Spanish officials moved to shore up confidence in the ailing local economy after new data showed unemployment at an 18-year high, after credit-ratings firm Standard & Poor’s slapped Spanish government debt with a two-notch downgrade.
“I was in the Spirit on the Lord’s day, and heard behind me a great voice, as of a trumpet, 11 Saying, ‘I am Alpha and Omega, the first and the last: and, What thou seest, write in a book, and send it unto the seven churches which are in Asia; unto Ephesus, and unto Smyrna, and unto Pergamos, and unto Thyatira, and unto Sardis, and unto Philadelphia, and unto Laodicea.’” Revelation 1:10-11 (KJV)
If any of you, dear readers, lose or have lost an unusal object, just give me a “heads up”, most likely, at some point, I will find it while looking down.
The book starts out in an almost jocular vein after the intro as Edgar goes about his business, but as the disaster draws ever nearer, the tone changes. There are some great scenes of stiff upper lips and trench-style camaraderie, but none is more evocative than the last village cricket match on the night of the impact. After the moon crashes, life becomes much more serious – as at first the survivors have to learn to survive. Then, as society begins to pick itself up again, politics rears its ugly head over the fate of the moon, and we begin our descent into the abyss – for there’s always some kind of abyss in a dystopian novel.
And where the HELL was Eric?! Okay, okay I get it, one of the major (of many; TOO many) plot lines was Eric’s maker and his creepy Romanov boy toy occupying his time. But I really wanted to see more of him, especially because such major things happened between him and Sookie in the last book. That being said, the Alexi Romanov being a Vampire? Pretty damn cool. That’s what I’m talking about when I talk about Harris’ characters and plots.
(Name) is a pretty cool guy. (Eh/Esh) (verb) (noun) and doesn’t afraid of anything.
Author: Caleb Carr
Needless to say, there is much more to RAND’s work than the strategic thought of Albert Wohlstetter, and Abella’s book is an introduction to the broad range of ideas RAND has espoused — from “rational choice theory” (explaining all human behavior in terms of self-interest) to the systematic execution of Vietnamese in the CIA’s Phoenix Program during the Vietnam War. As an institution, the RAND Corporation remains one of the most potent and complex purveyors of American imperialism. A full assessment of its influence, both positive and sinister, must await the elimination of the secrecy surrounding its activities and further historical and biographical analysis of the many people who worked there.
Most of the animals were busy looking for food today, not surprising given the weather. I heard a few birds singing, but not many for example. This song sparrow perched on a branch long enough for one song.
Why? How many people do you know who would suffer for centuries just to redeem his friends? That's killer support, baby! He's totally red carpet material in my book.
But Modern day IT environments are dynamic and complex, making it difficult to manage the enormous amounts of data coming at your disposal. They come from all your applications, diverse systems and multiple connected networks.
The Miss in question is Eliana Burki and is not only easy on the eyes but claims to be the only Alpenhorn player to get world wide attention. I'm must admit I'm a bit skeptical but definitely curious to check it out.
The season of Lent is upon us! Well, almost. For our Eastern Orthodox friends, Lent begins today, but for the Western church, it will begin with Ash Wednesday - this Wednesday!
Jamie Lynn Fallon, 23, Woodbridge, Va.
Also know as black drawing salve. This stuff is amazing! A friend who deals with horses suggested I use that to pack my dog's wound. She said they use it on horses and it is amazing. No cleaning, no dressings, just repack 1-3 times a day. This sounded like an answer to prayer for me.
Stopping piracy, especially in waters where it is a definite danger, is really not a difficult matter. It requires a very simple strategy and the desire to implement the strategy - at a fraction of the costs that have been spent on ransoms. It does not require massive warships patrolling the area. Furthermore, the aim ought to be to prevent the ship from being taken – not to only do something once the ship has been taken.
And here's your chance to win an ecopy of the book!
Dominic Paget, the earl of Bedford, will do anything to resume spying upon Britain’s enemies. Badly wounded, he is put will do anything in the care of a beautiful gentlewoman, Julianne Greystone, only to discover that her sympathies lie with his enemies. Yet he can’t help but seduce the woman who saved his life—hoping she never learns of his betrayal.
BIG CHRIS: Son, have a look in his locker.
I slip into your caress,
The principle of this technique with stamping is the same as you would use when colouring in your usual fashion. In fact to make it easier you could have two of the same image and colour one of them the way you usually do. This way you will see where the shades will be.
So on a balmy Sunday evening, we headed over to EPCOT to watch fireworks, share a funny cake and cuddle. It was shaping up to be a great night. As the fireworks burst overhead, he leaned in… and said…
That’s it. Eat away.
"Not really," I replied, so he used a degree of artistic license.
Now, if you’re like most folks (including, I must admit, me), you probably worried that the pennies led to a Hansel & Gretel-type situation. And I suppose if your kids are going to do a penny harvest, it’s best for them to go in pairs. (Click here to go to find out more about Common Cents.)
He is fairly certain the Easter Bunny has beady red eyes and sharp teeth.
All participants who place their post link in the blue frog linky, and who have created a project that follows the theme/rules, will be emailed this set for FREE.
I have been a Realtor in the Boise area since 1991 and, for the first 15 years of my career, home prices rose about 3% per year, roughly equivalent to the long-term average of 3-4% appreciation for all houses since World War II, according to the National Association of Realtors.
after the show the band lingered around the venue socializing with what was left of the crowd (bottom photo).
1/2 tablespoon baking soda
Now if this is truly a special day… Then I don’t want to celebrate it with more things to do! really I just would love a day off on the extra day. I mean think about it extra hrs of sleep, relaxing, sipping a fruity drink, and doing nothing, nada, nichts, rien, niente…
Stay posted as next week I will review this new release and let you know if it has revived my interest in a series I once loved.
6Surely every man walketh in a vain shew: surely they are disquieted in vain: he heapeth up riches, and knoweth not who shall gather them.
Other than spending tomorrow with the Cuties and their parents, I plan to have a lazy, relaxing weekend and couldn't be happier about it!
As I’d mentioned earlier, oysters aren’t the only pearl producers. Abalones, a certain genus of molluscs, also produce pearls. Abalone pearls are among the world’s most valuable pearls because of their rarity. Also, in comparison with oyster pearls, they are extremely difficult to culture (Yes, pearls are cultured by artificially implanting a tiny particle in the oyster. Natural pearls are generally more valuable than cultured pearls of the same quality).
I guess our dream puppy is growing into his terror chew stage later in his puppyhood!
Not, I expect, seated at a harmonium in his underpants like Terry Jones from Monty Python. No, I didn’t expect that either. You see people are – to us – who we think or imagine them to be, not necessarily as they actually are. For instance, did you know that Gauguin spent part of his childhood in Peru and that one of his parents was part Peruvian. Or did you know that he sold Tarpaulins in Denmark before his marriage fell apart, or even that he worked for a while as a labourer on the Panama canal? People are often not what we expect. Sometimes they’re better!
Views of the mountains which are nice and close.
SI-ID : Not unless we bribe the disc jockey.
I would still consider Boston the favourites to win this game despite Rondo’s absence. I still think they have more talent than Atlanta, even without Rondo, and that they’ll come out with great intensity and focus knowing that their margin for error tonight is much smaller without Rajon Rondo. I expect Pierce to take the lead and show Boston the way.
It’s not talked about openly, but the work place bake sale is the fiercest ‘non competitive’ competition you will ever experience- as I have learned. Baking is like poetry, it reveals something about the real you to people who don’t really know you.
Anyway, so one reason I went to Ecobuild was out of interest. The other was because I thought it might be an opportunity to discover some interesting people to work with.
But most importantly, I love making time each day to meet with God through my Bible reading and prayer.
Have a midlife crisis on your birthday, no matter what age you are! It is important that you do it right: have an affair, buy an expensive sports car, then quit your job and move to a beach somewhere in Belize.
The last few days, I have written about our trip to the Central Valley in California. We were visiting friends who just happen to have a Pontoon Boat. They invited us to take a Sunday afternoon cruise but first we BBQ’d at their home. With our tummies full, we loaded the boat and piled into their SUV. The lake was close maybe 30 minutes away. After arriving at the lake, we tried to unload the boat and hit a snag. The boat was not releasing from the trailer. The guys fiddled and fussed for a bit but eventually the boat floated free and we were able to start our boat trip.
2 medium zucchini, sliced
Unfortunately, one of them decided that a better escape route would be from a hole in the cladding above my head, where it leaped to freedom, landing on the nearest available tall thing in the vicinity.
By the way, RPI is currently 5.6%, and a more realistic measure of the financial increases people actually have had to shoulder. Some people will tell you that USS had no choice but to switch to using CPI instead of RPI because the scheme follows the measure used by official pensions, and so when official pensions switched to CPI, then our pension had to too. This is partly true, but it was also within the power of our trustees to break the link with official pensions.
19) Landing Page Bounce Rate - Think of this number as the flip side to your landing page conversion rate — it describes the percentage of people that visit your landing page and then immediately leave. If your bounce rate is high, you might need to better align the offer on the page with the language on the landing page, or come up with a more enticing offer.
We adopted Duchess at the end of August. She was thirteen years old and she had been living in the shelter for eight years. In the short time we had together, she became a loyal friend. She was never cross, even in her final days. I grieve for a dear, faithful,loving and affectionate friend. I loved her the moment I saw her photograph on Petfinder and I will love her for all eternity.
Halloween is the best holiday for children. They cut school, dress up and are allowed to have all the candy they want for just this day. Parents also like this holiday as children can enjoy their time without having to organize a party or other expensive event for them.
With many nuclear power stations and coal plants ending their lives and being taken out of service we “can’t rule out” people being left without power. The real problem is the cost of making sure this does not happen, and Britain’s lights “do not go out”, he warned.
For our guests who want to stay several days we provide a very attractive package:
(to be concluded)
On a slight side note, have you ever noticed how little attention stores pay to Thanksgiving? Each and every year, I can't help but take a moment to think about how very said this is :( Thanksgiving is one of my favorite holidays! Once Halloween is said and done, everyone just steamrolls straight to Christmas Christmas Christmas!
"You take it on faith, you take it to the heart. The waiting is the hardest part."
2. One of the main benefits of homeschooling is the freedom and flexibility it allows. Can you give us a few examples of how this freedom and flexibility benefited you (your family)?
You are my little best friend. I don't understand parents who long for the days of school, when their children are gone and aren't around to interrupt their daily activities.
our world forever ….
Just as often as I sense the
Intuitives
Congrats, Marcia, on all your accomplishments!
The man of iron
While fireplaces have traditionally been in demand, even they may be slipping in popularity.
After presents, we'd have a hearty breakfast and load into our old Buick to go to Pennsylvania to go my mother's childhood home for a second Christmas. We'd then have a huge Christmas dinner. I still laugh that my sisters and I were at a "children's" card table late into our teens and perhaps even into our twenties!
I am drinking tea, catching up with the emails and thinking about when to grab the bathroom to have a shower - with an 11 yr old daughter it gets harder to grab a slot !
Many years back she started to cook more than one bird for the dinner. Since the larger turkey took up all the space in her main oven she bought a medium sized rotisserie oven to cook a smaller, second turkey.
Alien Adventure
He had to leave his leg in this CPM machine for 12-16 hours a day. It would slowly move in & out to keep his leg from tightening up. Oh the joy!
When I think of the word support, I think of bras. I know- strange- but I do. First, you have the training bra- that is comparable to that which I just mentioned- you don't give dirty looks at someone who is breastfeeding in public, or you don't lead them into booby traps. You aren't discouraging, but you could do more.
The inventor/engineer/architect Buckminster Fuller (he preferred to be called a "comprehensive anticipatory design scientist") proposed to build the ballpark as a geodosic dome. And it would be much more than a ballpark, it would be an "all-weather, year-round sports palace capable of pulling in big money as a showplace for every kind of sporting event and exposition."
Rays of sucess...
It is funny and of course quite predictable considering these day’s need for survival for kids at daycare that his first words were
I’m going to be completely honest. If I hadn’t read in one of Grace’s reviews that Hoid popped up in a different Sanderson novel I may not have noticed. My memory is not so good. Given this, I have no clue as to his role. Is he some type of messenger?
I don't know what my problem is but I can't seem to wake up today. It happens from time to time - I feel lackadaisical, lazy, like a slacker. Maybe it's my diet, maybe I'm just getting old, perhaps it's because I do too much. Whatever the case, I'm tired of being tired.
1458 ***D-III/7(A)/2003. “Irving Dilliard (1904-2002).” Dedication, First Friday Lecture Series, The University of Chicago, The Cultural Center, Chicago Public Library, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item B-15 (Projected), above, pp. 430-31 (2004).)
So, what’s happening in your life or more to the point, what has happened to you over the past months or years? What aspects of your life would you like to improve? If you lost your job, house, car, family or something even worse, you are likely to have experienced any number of emotions from hurt, anger and grief, to blame, complain and a sense of helplessness. However, as understandable as these reactions are, they won’t help you dig out and rebuild.
I accidentally “tooted” at work today, and I have to say, this one took me by surprise. One scale of 1-10 for potency, lingering ability and nasty factor, this one was an 8. Work toots should always be a 3 or below.
I hoped they would launch more lacquers, but sadly enough they didn't.
I should probably get to going, since I have to finish lunch for the kiddos, so we can head to Field Day.
I am here and your heart is safe with me
Wednesday and Thursday was more of a normal school situation. We tried to catch up with the things we'd neglected this week. On Friday, we did our school work then spent the afternoon at the beach.
2 nine inch pie crusts (I used Pillsbury)
But March is mostly given over, in terms of reading, to these tasks:
And some with a fountain pen.
[N]euroimaging remains a crude technology, unable to meaningfully weigh in on assessments of guilt or innocence, especially on an individual basis. Imaging methods make use of highly processed blood flow signals, which cover tens of cubic millimetres of brain tissue. In a single cubic millimetre of brain tissue, there are some 100,000,000 synaptic connections between neurons. So modern neuroimaging is like asking an astronaut in the Space Shuttle to look out of the window and judge how America is doing. He can spot giant forest fires, or a plume of volcanic activity billowing from Mt. Rainier, or the consequences of broken New Orleans levies – but from his vantage he is unable to detect whether a crash of the stock market has led to widespread depression and suicide, whether racial tensions have sparked rioting, or whether the population is stricken with influenza.
Billy Bob Thornton (Primary Colors, A Simple Plan)
Being an engineer, I got a little excited about the statistics of this little journey of mine. I wanted to know the actual amount of energy I use compared to the rest of the U.S. So I did some calculations.
Gets close to.
Some of the most beautiful, expansive people I know are Americans.
QUERESHI AM, HUGHES NJM, MURPHY E, PRIMROSE WR. Factors influencing uptake of influenza vaccination among hospital-based health care workers. Occup Med (Lond) 2004; 54: 197-201.
drawing nostrils. I laughed a little. Then he put a dot in one
As far as the novel is concerned, the importance of the writer is still paramount, though all of us have learned to keep a close eye on the rear-view mirror. In the theatre the playwright is at least the equal partner of the performers, but in film the writer is shouldered aside by director, actor, producer, and editor, who together transform the printed word into something far more glamorous and evocative.
Write about leaping, leap year or leap day.
I stood up, unsure of what to do or where to go. My memory told me that deserts had landmarks, like a cactus here and there or mountains in the distance. I could see nothing but flat, empty sand. I picked a direction and started walking, still unsure what purpose this dream was serving…if it was a dream. It felt so real! But surely, no place on earth could be so barren or still. As I walked, my mind wandered. What else does one do in a place with no one to talk to and nothing to look at?
I thought about doing one comic a day for all of our testing days, but quite honestly there just isn’t a lot going on.
Fireworks flash!!! CONFETTI!!! STREAMERS!!! Simultaneously, the huge bell is struck with a log swung by important monks and local politicians (they take turns giving the bell 13 strikes), AND a serious loudspeaker system blasts a triumphal symphony, to announce the New Year's arrival. We are all one year older.
In my pain I realized I was a bad mother, because I wasn’t listening to my heart. I was fighting everything and trying too hard. There had to be another way.
"We wanted him to clearly apologise," Sheikh Yusef Abu Hussein, mufti of the southern city of Karak, told AFP after the pope's address in Amman's huge Al-Hussein Mosque.
In which I talk tediously of heartache, indecision, nausea and the all-important tummy ache.
Over the course of highschool to university there was a transition in me, I started noticing how I have changed and matured and discovered what I feel like my adolecent life is all about. I learnt that its important to discover the person you are and be true to yourself. I think the three most important things are living, laughing, and loving. If you have those down pact....I think you have the ability to overcome any obstacle or curve ball that is thrown your way. Having faith and hope in God's plan that he has set out for you will also get you through life's journey.
Death is something I’m become very close with. Someone close to me has died every year since I was maybe only 10 years old. I know all the traditions of wakes and funerals, of in between lunches, graveyard goodbyes, church readings, and everything before, after and in between. I’m not bragging about this. Believe me, I would much rather be uneducated in this topic, but fact is, I am very accustom to saying goodbye.
My tip is to first start by making a “frame and name“. Just draw a frame around the page freehand and write your name, date and title at the bottom.
According to God and the gospel, however, it is not.
there is still the almost daily muck to wade through, but there is beauty in every step. as hard & painful as it can be sometimes, i love being a mother & wife. & i do truly appreciate the work it takes to be both. living consciously & with intention requires a constant shuffle, a constant learning, a constant desire to fight against complacency. i am unwilling to be a half-present mother, a distant wife, & what is funny & what is *of Course* is that i am both of these by nature. when things get really hard i want, i need to sleep. i want to pretend it isn't happening. but thankfully, i have three teachers in this house & one in my belly that keep reminding me that That is not the way. maybe it can be for an afternoon, but not for a lifetime.
Q. Is this all the property associated with NAMA that is for sale?
Re-Animator (1985)
You must be willing to at every single step, at every single temptation for anger, every temptation to start the lower cycle back up, you must be willing to confront your angers, frustrations and fears head on, explore inside of yourselves in a Loving and detached way why you are feeling the way you are, forgive yourselves and any other involved for any negative energies around or attached to one’s emotions, absorb and integrate the lessons and the energies behind them, and move on.
But, I grabbed some plush for her.
Not so long ago, anyone in Brazil who wanted to make enough money to support their family was better off getting on the first flight out of there and going to work abroad.
Legitimate:
As we left Legoland this afternoon, Charlie said "That was fun, Dad." Mission accomplished.
Music historian-rock
He said he'd not forget
Problems cannot be solved effectively if your high or wasted all the time.
By this standard, philanthropy and nonprofits have solidly achieved the industrial state. Three recent pieces on the consulting businesses that serve philanthropy and nonprofits caught my attention. The Chronicle of Philanthropy ran this piece, noting some of the bigger name firms. It also noted that the services these organizations provide used to be offered up pro bono. Now they are lines of business or entire firms unto themselves.
In March, I gave notice to the company I had been working for in my salaried, full-time position. In the course of 7 months, I worked over 2,100 hours. The company has stated they would like me to continue working for them and an offer is being drafted, but I have yet to receive that. I have been actively looking for work and have an offer on the table; one that would make for shocking changes in my home and with my youngest son – who still sees therapists weekly – and has massive adjustment issues that are detrimental to his progress. If you’ve never seen a child who has adjustment difficulties, I could introduce you to my youngest. It’s the one area that is still developmentally behind and a struggle to this day.
It is unclear what Synergy Drive’s dividend policy is, but shareholders may have to settle for lower yields as the merged group will need to absorb Guthrie’s large debts of over RM2 billion. Guthrie has a gearing ratio of 46%, compared with well under 10% for GHope and Sime Darby.
And then there’s the way unschooling has centered and anchored me through the storm. My kids always center me, of course – if they’re okay, I’m okay – but this is more than that. Unschooling is *there*, a core purpose that runs through even the toughest days. I mean, not once in the past week have I given a thought to creating a learning-rich environment or accommodating my kids’ different learning styles or even unschooling itself really (and I usually think about unschooling quite a bit), but I’ve been conscious of and immensely comforted by all the sparkly moments of learning.
I fell for the time it took to live a lifetime.
Obstacle 2: The product was not unique or exceptional in anyway.
Ok, I don´t have much to say today. But I´m still trying to get that last weight off. And I would be sooo happy to see 73 on the scale on Saturday or Sunday. That would be about 162 lbs!
Now, you're surely curious about the Elissa name and the sailing ship on the bottle. Here's Saint Arnold's explanation:
Three days ago I have transgressed boundaries in an online writing class, trying to write for a given writing prompt, cleverly, albeit unaware at the time that that’s what I was doing, The result backfired. Whilst the writing itself was OK (I think), the theme and the story line it followed was not mine. I have unintentionally picked up, a thread of another person’s story and presented a continuation to that story without thinking if it is correct to do that or ask for permission.
And at the end of the day
I know I am.
The drawings in the Donald Young show were total rubbish anyway you look at it. But the sculpture fountains were great. Maybe they didn’t say much. Maybe if a PhD in contemporary art theory was there to school me on the works’ finer points it would have meant more. But what I do know is that the work was engaging. The sights and sounds of the huge contraptions cycling on and off was strangely peaceful and meditative. And he is a famous artist, so I was also a little bit star struck.
A woman had started a political paper! A woman! Could he believe his eyes? A woman! Instantly he sprang to his feet and clutched his pantaloons, shouted to the assistant editor, when he, too, read andgrasped frantically at his cassimeres, called to the reporters and pressmen and typos and devils, who all rushed in, heard the news, seized their nether garments and joined the general chorus, “My breeches! oh, my breeches!” Here was a woman resolved to steal their pantaloons, their trousers, and when these were gone they might cry “Ye have taken away my gods, and what have I more?” The imminence of the peril called for prompt action, and with one accord they shouted, “On to the breach, in defense of our breeches! Repel the invader or fill the trenches with our noble dead.”
In other words, the more you can make your product sound like it solves a long-neglected problem and the more you can make it sound one of a kind, the more click-throughs and sales you’ll make.
Another thing that is in a way Emergency Preparedness was Jonathan's purchase of an Air soft gun. He had hoped this would work for hunting small things like chipmunks (which raid our strawberries and he was hoping to butcher and add to stew) but after an unhappy attempt we decided that it wasn't powerful enough. This gun is however a useful tool for him to use in target practicing and such. If he should ever need the skill to hunt to feed us, having a little practice will come in handy. (More about getting the gun here.)
£4.00 full price
Upcoming carnival: @ Delightful Education on 5/15
That's when her problems really start.
Needless to say, my giving pool is currently dry, and I've been declining requests for pro-bono consulting or products. I've found that increasingly, people and organizations have presented a self-entitled attitude. Not only is that attitude a major turn off, it discourages me from ever working with that person or group. I'm a person. I do not have endless personal funds to give to non-profits. I have a family and friends that I would like to see. I am not obligated to give my time away. Now don't get me wrong. There are many instances in which I am happy to help, and I volunteer my time and my services without being approached. I do still enjoy helping causes and friends, but I'm much more selective in what I do these days.
Celebrate the night with Freak, the dangerously exotic first fragrance from cult British beauty brand, Illamasqua.
One of them was my own little in-house mustard seed Gabi.
Let me begin by apologizing for last week’s little tantrum. It was a bad week. I don’t really want to go into all of why it was so bad, but it just was. Nothing terrible happened… just a lot of emotional back sliding, over reaction, and spreading the misery around.
I’ve often listened for the phone, hoping he’d call to ask me to come home as he’d once done, but now I know the truth, I feel it.
I decided to have a countdown of ‘30 Days Until You Turn 30.’ The exact details changed a few times, but this is what I ended up doing:
· Have a way to ask questions of an OSHA approved trainer
First of all, on Monday, we had the Standards hearing which found Cabinet member Brian Coleman in breach of the code of conduct, on two counts of failing to show respect to residents, and indeed treating them in a way that the investigator described as 'personally offensive, abusive, demeaning, and designed to cause hurt and distress to the recipient'.
"We have launched an internal investigation into the editorial process surrounding this particular story," a Today spokesman told The Hollywood Reporter.
My TedXAustin 2011 experience can be described with several words: reflection, sharing, compassion, and understanding. This experience had energy that was different from the others. Many of the speakers spoke about pain, confusion, heart ache, and triumph. I didn't leave thinking that I was going to change the world, but I certainly did leave feeling a wider range of emotion than on a normal day. The day started with an engaging performance by Mother Falcon. Mother Falcon was like the liberal Austin version of classical music. Performance and style like that kind of make me wish I didn't give up on the piano 10 years ago. I was in awe.
Last week, a tense naval standoff erupted between Chinese and Philippine ships at the Scarborough Shoal, about 500 kilometers (310 miles) north of the Spratlys.
action, see, ANNUL. Applying the force of deadly violence, you
He called right when I got off work, and there was something very wrong in his voice. Sometimes, I curse this woman’s intuition.
“Sorry to interrupt this lovely tete-a-tete,” Regnans said, “but would you please open the gate? I left Westside completely unguarded.”
As educators we are being asked to prepare students for an ever changing world, a world that they do not really understand, nor can predict. The educational world in which students live is typically a ‘bubble’ away from the ideas, issues, concerns, events of the real world. Education, as I experienced it as a student, was a preparation to inherit this ever changing world, but the activities and learning for preparation had little to no significance for what I was about to do in the big wide world. The pathways in school were clear, a hierarchy of subject knowledge in place that would be most useful for me, and a production line of information poured into me. Knowledge equaled information. In Sir Ken Robinson’s book he extends the analogy of the student as empty vessel, but converts what I had always imagined to be an ornate ancient Greek pot, into a vessel with much greater currency…. a gas tank. In this analogy, students are the tank, and teachers are the attendants at a full serve gas station. When the students come into the station, teachers fill them up, and then the students go out into the world. But for some reason, we as teachers seem to almost convince ourselves that this gas station is the only one that students are going to need in their entire life, and students for some reason buy into this philosophy. The problem is, that eventually, these students, zipping around in the big wide world, are going to run out of gas, but they don’t recognize that their fuel gage is beeping crying out for them to return for another fill up. The reason for this aloof attention to detail is that students have become indoctrinated with the ‘right idea’, that there is a path to the ‘correct’ answer, that 1+1 always equals 2. Many people exit from school under the pre-tense that their fill up has provided them with the information that they need in order to be successful for the rest of their lives.
For most this would be excessive. For me? Well, I went through over a kilo of green and red tea last year, running out of nearly all my favorites between an overseas shipment in March and a trip to Paris in December. If something didn't "fit" me, I found it a new home with a fellow tea-lover. Like with perfume (where true lovers passionately enjoy samples and decants), tea-lovers are in it for the goods . . . that waft of perfumed wonder incited by the rush of hot liquid. Who cares if someone opened it first?
It hasn’t always been easy, though. In 1993 the original hospital site was closed, and patients were transferred to the new Chapel Allerton Hospital, built by extending what had been the hospital’s Newton Green Wing. At first there was no room available for our studio, but eventually in 1997 space was found. A new studio with improved equipment was painstakingly built from scratch by our long-serving station engineer Mike Turner, and broadcasting recommenced on 3rd April 1999. Then in 2003 we faced possible closure through lack of volunteers, when we were struggling to put out more than 2 regular programmes a week.
Dear Richard,
While the town of New Brunswick, New Jersey is known for its history, bars, restaurants, and nightlife, Bucceleuch Park makes it case to be viewed as the “soul” of New Brunswick,. It is the only park in town, and has something to do for everyone. I spoke with three Rutgers University seniors and New Brunswick residents about the park and what it has to offer them, as well as people of all ages, shapes, and sizes who reside in and visit the lovely town of New Brunswick.
I bought the rhubarb on a whim. Mainly because it was so beautiful and my excitement got the better of me. This spontaneous purchase resulted in making a batch of rhubarb compote—one of the easiest things to make in the world. This delicious, honey sweetened concoction is best when plopped on coconut milk yogurt or ice cream. Highly recommended.
The NUMBER ONE complaint of all customers in regards to the Sales experience is;
solvent based blender pen
You know, I’ve read so many documents and articles about game developing, more specific, about those games I used to play as a kid and I found some similarities among different developers. But recently I discovered some other indian videogame developers that also contribute to the topic showing what techniques and the step by step of any videogame design and development, so I took the advice and before starting with the coding (which I always do first), this time, for this game in particular I am going to start with the graphics and of course the construction of all the elements that need to be included in the game.
The proposed law does not empower the Federal Government in any way. It merely requires that any state which issues a concealed carry license, concealed handgun license, whatever your state calls it — must honor a similar license issued by another state. No state is compelled to have a concealed handgun license, and any state that does not, will not be required to recognize one. The only state in this category is Illinois, anyway, so once again we have a “Chicago Exception”. To make this abundantly clear, barring court action forcing Illinois to actually recognize the Second Amendment, Illinois will continue to be someplace that does not have any form of concealed carry law, until the voters of Illinois and its Legislature determine otherwise.
Doesn't it just make you feel spring in the air?
But, but, but, it's only 9:52 PM, why does the time you posted on your blog different from the actual time, if you just posted? But, wait, what I really want to know is when Brooklyn's birthday is? - megryansmom
Bonus single player missions focusing on other non-penal army units
At 5:00? The custom-ordered Cubic right angle weave (CRAW) bracelet I am currently trying to finish. I carved out a teeny tiny corner of my huge workbench so I could meet the deadline on this bracelet. I'm sure none of you can relate to having to carve out a tiny space to work in, when you have such a nice big work area at your disposal!
Professor : So, you believe in God?
We went to one of our favorite restaurant’s Mary’s Italian Trattoria on Cherry Street, and was able to custom-order exactly what I was looking for: a shrimp pasta with a simple lemon spaghetti. I ended up getting shrimp scampi with plain spaghetti and squirted a bunch of lemon juice on it. So delicious!
In addition, the feedback given is often in a poor format. There are usually general statements, covering a broad sweep of behaviours and impresions, rather than being issue-specific. Worse still, feedback can focus on who the person is, rather than the actions they have taken. Feedback should try to concentrate on actual events, not inference and speculation. The general comments often offered are not always helpful for a trainee to think about. More helpful, and a better substrate for examining ones behaviour, are examples of specific situations where a behaviour has influenced others – either for better or for worse. Even better if the impact of the behaviour can be explained. eg. when X said this after it happened, it made me feel Y, because of Z. (This article and this pdf have some interesting ideas and principles for good feedback)
Today I am began my 30 days of shredding in an attempt to get my pre-T body back. If I am successful at this I will be enlisting the help of a doctor to get my pre-J body back :)
- a headboard (from craigslist) painted white
It made more sense for me to return home with no job than to venture off to a lonely city (DC or Chicago) with no job. I am still applying to jobs in DC because I can waive into the DC Bar, and I am still applying for jobs in Chicago that don't require IL Bar admission (or any bar admission for that matter).
I have gained mastery over the river.
Angela had died several years before. She had endured enough suffering with her alcoholic husband that one day she decided to leave him. She packed two suitcases and left with her daughters to stay with family in Dallas. They left Freeport at six in the evening, and Angela knew the trip would be long. The tropical storm had arrived and she had trouble seeing through the thick showers of rain. With every oncoming headlight, her heart raced. At around midnight, Rebecca awoke and began crying in the backseat. She didn’t know why they were on the road at such a late time. She only knew she missed her bed and her stuffed animals. Mabel, who was 15 at the time, 11 years older than Rebecca, was asleep. Angela placed her arm behind the backseat to calm Rebecca down.
But unlike its larger cousin, the pygmy hippopotamus is not one of the most dangerous animals in Africa. Being way smaller does that to you.
- Complete the SST course
Karin Alvtegen-Lundberg was born on June 8th, 1965 in Huskvarna, Sweden. In addition to writing novels – Missing is her fifth – she has also worked as a writer for television having written episodes of the Swedish soap operas Rederiet and Tre kronor. She also wrote the film script to the 2004 film Hotet and has worked in the art department on several other films. Translation rights have been sold to 30 countries and each novel has sold several hundred thousands of copies.
The week before Christmas, I was assaulted by various "emergencies" from my next door neighbor Pat. I don't know why she seems to think I'm available for her 24/7, or that I don't sleep, or shower, or take a shit, or am in any capacity ever too busy to humor her, but it is what it is, I guess. Somewhere in the mix, either during her midnight need for me to palpate her fatty leg deposit, or her urgency for me to come over right this minute to see her Christmas tree that I already saw last year, I did indeed inform her that we would be leaving on the 26th. She responded by telling me that she had two weeks off herself and would probably go visit a friend in another state, after her holiday with her family.
No hey guys unless you are out by such and such we are going to attack......
I remember waking up in the post-partum room, alone, confused, and looking at the clock. It was eight o'clock. My first thought? "Oh, I guess I won't be able to watch Lost tonight". This was apparently my brain's way of reverting to something normal.
Now you have two weeks to get in and make a card using the sketch.
Allonsanfàn himself turns out to be a character, a young revolutionary (Stanko Molnar), who is the most dedicated, the grimmest, and, ultimately, the most delusional. A stand-in for the young, violent Red Brigades? Allonsanfàn is also, oddly, named after the first two words of La Marseillaise ("Wake up, children!") - indeed, the strains of revolutionary France are an important reference for the revolutionaries of this film. (In the way that the Paris Commune inspired the 1968 Italian idealists?)
for healing, as I was unharmed
I see a change in our family.
That was me back in Phoenix. My husband left the house around 7am, came home at 7pm, played with the kids for an hour, then we'd veg out in front of the television for the rest of the night. Moving to Portland changed things around a bit. Ogre (for you new readers, this is my husband's nickname on my blog) works from home, generally eats all meals together with us, and sometimes takes off an entire afternoon to be with us. It changed our relationship (and yes, I'll be honest, it's sometimes harder to have him home all day long). I think we can honestly say that we know each other better after living like this for 5 years.
“And have no fellowship with the unfruitful works of darkness, but rather reprove them. For it is a shame even to speak of those things which are done of them in secret.”
During the day, we’d also get to see the Long-billed Curlews that have been reported near the Willow Deck recently, a Wilson’s Snipe, Cinnamon and Green-winged Teal, Hooded and Common Mergansers, and quite a few other species.
Like that pair of students, middle school or maybe younger, walking side by side sharing an ipod with one ear bud each. They walked with the confidence and synchronization of a single spokesperson, all black outfitted with bright white wires outlining their contour and their steps.
Sapphire, once again.
After accepting the girls request for a Saturday pie baking lesson, I wondered if they could manage the difficulty of rolling this particular crust. My theory is that the more difficult it is to roll and handle the better the finished product will be. Why did I even question this? They were so adaptable to the project. I wanted to show them how to bake a pie shell for cream pies. After a few suggestions, Aubrie ,the youngest one, produced a perfect pie shell, better than most that I have made. A great granddaughter joined us later in the afternoon. We made pumpkin, apple, fresh peach and banana cream with Hershey Bars in the bottom. We made three small individual pies with the left over filling from each variety, which we shared after a spaghetti supper. It was a great day of interaction between the three generations, good pie and I sent them merrily on their way with three of the pies for proof to their parents that they were where they said they were going. We ate the chocolate- banana cream pie along with our three small samples. Grandmothers, if you want a day of magic, initiate a cooking school with your granddaughters for a super day of interaction as well as passing along your experiences of being a good cook.
Dear friends, do not be surprised at the painful trial you are suffering, as though something strange were happening to you. But rejoice that you participate in the sufferings of Christ, so that you may be overjoyed when his glory is revealed. If you are insulted because of the name of Christ, you are blessed, for the Spirit of glory and of God rests on you.
I woke up feeling incredibly inspired today. Last night J & I took a fabulous interior design class and now the ideas just won't stop flowing. In the past I've always felt quite stifled and limited by our space but now I see that the possibilities are endless and I can't tell you how exciting that is.
1 dependent
4 Even though I walk through the “valley of the shadow of death,”
Whereas today they barely last ninety minutes to two hours. And if one should break the two hour barrier it’s almost always referred to in the reviews as though to warn those of a limited attention span that they would probably be best not bothering.
More than anything, I wanted to reach out and take his hurt away. But I was trapped in a bad dream. Immobilized. Inadequate. Helpless. Though God had assigned me to love and care for this beautiful child, I could do nothing to minimize his pain. My thoughts were an inward scream. This isn’t what I signed up to do, God! I don’t want to be a helpless onlooker. I want to parent my child. How can I care for him? What can I do?
The wife, whose voice quivered with emotion as she spoke, saying McClain was relentless in attacking the much smaller, 145-pound boyfriend.
On my commute home, I ride on Q Street, which has a nice bike lane to enjoy. Also, as I get closer to home, I veer off on Monroe Street, which parallels Michigan, but has less traffic. This morning, I thought I would try riding Monroe Street towards work and realized it wasn't as fun because it has a LONG uphill that took my breath away. Much better to save Monroe Street for my ride home, when I could enjoy a DOWNHILL. :)
Cheers, and thanks to anyone who’s joined me here.
I looked at it and I remembered her excitement when she got it. I remembered playing Green Day's track Basket Case, so she could hear what they sounded like. I remembered taking this picture of her seconds before she launched into an impromptu pogo session (similar to the Sheena episode). I remember realising too late that the song included the word ‘whore’ (tricky third verse, that), and wondering how I was going to explain that one to her when she asked. As she obviously would.
Lunch? We’d just finished, and this slacker was only beginning. Woo woo – time for us to go to work. My brother wanted to pelt the big clear windshield with a few rocks, hidden in the ditch as we were. How crude.
You can let the onion brown a bit if you want, but don’t let them darken enough to get bitter. While they’re cooking add whatever herbs you’re going to use. Store-boughten Cajun seasoning is fine; rendering it with the veggies kind of refreshes the flavors. Celery seed is good with all the meats/fish in this gumbo.
It's not very often that I share a blog with all of you in the hopes that you'll read it. But Heather's story, which you can read HERE, is worth sharing. You can also find a link to it in my blogroll under "Real People Doing BIG Things".
We have a winner of the name me stamp.
I just have to remember the “slow and steady” mantra for race day.
wait without love,
She gets caught up in language like this so often that it’s distracting. It bogs down the story. It takes you out of the moment and makes you want to skim. It all reads like a big, flowery poem. One that exists to allow the author the chance to show off and win awards.
(This post comes from Neal of North Chicago, Illinois.)
Like that nag Tokai Trick.
3. In tango, as opposed to other dances, I feel like I am an extension of my partner's body. I don't know what the other tangueras would have to say about that one, but it's how I see it at this point. It's like I'm the car and he's the driver. (or something like that lame metaphor) I have always enjoyed dancing alone, letting go of my mind and just moving to the music. When B and I started tango, I was terrified that I'm too just controlling to be allow myself to be led. So when I arrived at tango class I was surprised to find myself being swept along in my instructor's arms responding to his simple leads and somehow getting the basic premise of it. I was able to drop into my nonthinking bodymind and feel his lead instinctively because: 1. I trusted him, and 2. I had been doing this all along on my own. It was exactly what I did when I danced alone, letting my body interpret the music--I was now just letting my partner use my body to interpret the music. I've only just recently been able to understand this. I could probably write much more on this subject....
To the winner may indeed go the spoils...but the race has never been given to the swift nor to the strong but to the ones that endureth to the end..."the journey" aka "the race" is the Good Part.
Here is their advice:
Anyway, the article in Oprah caught my attention, and one part really resonated. It talked about working through fear - and that our brains can not simultaneously experience fear and appreciation. Making a list, or talking through what gives you comfort, support, and hope allows you to move past the fear. Throughout this journey, Andrew, J and I have been presented so much love and support and while it's been appreciated (a ton), it's not been officially recognized. We spent some of the afternoon on Thursday taking a walk and talking about our gratitude and what we've gained in this hard journey since Andrew entered the world.
Second point: if underage drinking isn't the first boozing indicator people look at -- and I happen to think it would be a lot less of a problem if we look the legal drinking age to 18, but that's another story -- they point to drunk driving. It's a serious and real issue, and it affects everyone quite personally, especially if you're on the road on a Saturday night.
Enchantments
Métro : Daumesnil
As for Russ and Timmy, well I can only hope for more of Timmy getting back at Russ in clever ways that only Timmy can do. Will Russ continue to have relations with gross Liz? Ew…I can’t even think about it.
Grape Variety: 100% Pinot Noir
P.D.James and Ruth Rendell both said they were particularly drawn to crime fiction and have written little else.
Today was absolutely beautiful despite the dreary weather. Nora had her official second outing to Nana and Papa’s house for Mother’s Day brunch. She also embarked on her first ferry ride, as the trip involves crossing the Ohio River. Nora fared well on the 20 minute drive and was content to sleep most of the time at Nana and Papa’s.
For the web students…. you might want to chedk out these 25 Free and Premium jQuery menu scripts – http://vandelaydesign.com/blog/web-development/jquery-menu-scripts/.
This year we are into a different belt of learning altogether. With the commencement 2012, the energies shifted subtly from trust to freewill. We are back at the helm of our lives and we are absolutely free to steer us where we will. It is a year of paradigm shift but that shift is not collective. We would be mistaken in envisioning fantastic events beyond our control manoeuvring us towards a great change more in accordance with the universe. No! It is a year of paradigm shift in that it begins with each individual undergoing great personal change that would reshape our personalities, goals and evolutionary paths. And as more individuals make the right choice the shift turns global and collective. Imagine series of tiny tube lights set in geometric shapes. Each beginning to flicker and finally glow one by one. Once all the tubes light up the whole shift from darkness to the light is complete!
Simple chic. These are pieces I'd love in my everyday wardrobe, and yet here they are--on a glam night out. Juliette Binoche is my new queen.
You’re different
Spain was less pessimistic than Greece, no surprise there, who scored 41 and Portugal who scored 36, which Nielsen described as “alarming”. Why Portugal is more pessimistic than Greece is not clear.
- 1 1/2 teaspoons fennel seed, crushed
pastry:
man of God, Prophet T.B.
In a small bowl, sprinkle the gelatin over the surface of the 1/3 cup water. Set aside to soften.
I have a thing for a yellow and gray colored weddings, and this one is no different. The bridesmaids dresses were all so cute! And the yellow shawls topped it all off beautifully. This fall wedding is gorgeous because even though the leaves everywhere were yellow, the yellow details of this wedding still stood out.
I hope you all have a wonderful valentine's day and your loved ones spoil you rotten!
If you Give My Husband a Paintbrush...
“I came out, washed my hands and I come out of the restroom, and there was a lady outside who said, ‘Oh, that’s a man,’” Witherspoon said. “I just ignored her.”
By A. G. SULZBERGER, Published: October 10, 2011
Since Thanksgiving is almost here, I thought I'd point you in the direction of my turkey day music compilation I put together a few years ago and updated last year.
The run was pretty uneventful for the most part. I just kept pounding away the miles. We did run over some pretty wooden bridges on a few of the paved trail portions and there was also a street bridge over 1 mile long we had to run over. The police were on site all day there to keep one of the 2 lanes closed for the race which made it a lot safer. I ended up finishing in 8:14 which I was okay with.
The next morning, I went to 7 Eleven to see the mainstream media headlines : ” Bersih is violent” “Bersih kotor dan ganas” and so on. Well, I was at ground zero from 7am in the morning. If we wanted to be violent, we had ample time to do so-but it did not happen( only at the end).
The drapes for the living and dining room are sewn and ready to hang!
18. “In the show, Yunhanam, the person who is the best at making a girl happy is Taemin.” (KEY) But he is still at a stage when he is more enthusiastic of dogs than girls.
Well, it is I, who writes,
To let ‘em rest — unexpressed,
And even though there is a lot of journalling there, it still doesn't express all of the feelings I feel.
I just thought the most of people there speak English~ and young people never speak French!! LOL
1/3 c. plain greek yogurt (goes into the chicken and the bread, how convenient, right?)
So, even though I’ve worked on this, off and on, for the better part of a week, I’ve decided that it’s best to simply let the show speak for itself – with a few choice “promo” videos and some of those awesome “voiceover” quotes I gathered with the help of the “In Plain Sight” Wikiquote site:
Even though I know it’s wrong,
However: three months after giving birth, despite squirting out milk like a human cow, I still weigh nearly ten stone. According to this NHS BMI calculator, this means I am overweight, "which increases the risk of becoming ill with problems such as high blood pressure, heart disease and cancer". What fun!
Because his basic premise is that identity is something that is created in narration, it is logical that he looks at literary examples. The evidence he uses and the examples he discusses are drawn from fiction, autobiography, law and psychoanalysis. His main sources are Rousseau, Proust and Freud, though along the way he uses Stendhal, Balzac, Conan-Doyle Joyce, Yeats and others. The depth of his critical engagement with Freud’s work provides a ground for the discussion.
It was time to stop fighting.
She directed most of her criticism against the “repressive, militarized, corrupt” regime of outgoing President Ali Abdullah Saleh, but also lamented that the revolution in Yemen hasn’t gained as much international attention as the revolts in Egypt, Tunisia, Libya and Syria.
"Heroes, she said, were not always pure in motive and character, sometimes they told lies or they were conflicted and unhappy..." (85)
Today it's time for the 45th challenge of Marianne Design Challenge Blog http://mariannedesign.blogspot.com/. The challenge is hosted by Marjan and she wants to see an image from Mattie. There are so much images of her that it's difficult to choose.
I know I've already posted this LO but I wanted to show you how the 8.5"x11" LO is works with a 12x12 album.
The other thing you get for your money with the Medion Erazer is connectivity. There are four USB ports, two of which are the faster USB 3.0 format as well as four 3.5mm jacks for headphones and microphones. Medion has also included HDMI, eSata, VGA and Ethernet ports next to the power socket on the back of the laptop. And then there’s the Blu-ray DVD/RW optical drive too.
David and I have a million questions right now that we won't get the answers to for awhile. We are hoping this change with the Ministry of Woman's Affairs is temporary. We hope any day now we'll get an email that things are back to normal.
Well, today an enterprising friend found it for me! Weirdly, it’s not for sale by itself, but is included as an extra feature with one of Stanley’s full length feature films, “Dust Devil.” The new copies are a bit pricey at $35, but there are a number of used copies available for a fraction of the cost.
The King sent the Magi, to Bethlehem with orders to find the child so that he may worship him too. So they went on their way and followed the star of light, until it stopped over the place where the child was born on this night.
Happy Friday!! I hope you all have had a great week!! I'm STILL getting over a cold (boo), and I'm planning getting tons of rest tonight, because I've got QUITE a weekend planned!
*The fruits can be soaked months before ,it tastes great.
hair perfect
Compared to Liege & Lief it sounds less affected - earthier maybe. It might have to do with the singing, which, following Denny's departure, was taken up by the previously non-singing instrumentalists. The voices are rough and plain, but work well with this kind of material. The performances are jaunty and hard-edged, but you can tell that the band doesn’t take itself too seriously. While maybe not as important as its predecessor, the album is definitely a lot more fun. It’s also among the most hard rocking and viscerally satisfying records of the band’s career, in no small part due to the chemistry between demon-fiddler David Swarbrick and impossibly-talented-beyond-his-years guitarist Richard Thompson.
“Lucy, you be nice,” Mom encouraged with a sweet grin.
Before those two Thugs
The Bath Corporation realised they needed to organise entertainment for this sudden annual influx of visitors. They firstly appointed a Captain Webster as 'King of Bath', or Master of the Ceremonies. But Captain Webster was most unfortunately killed in a duel the following year. And so in 1705, Richard Nash was offered the post.
For the time being, however, between 4pm and midnight you won’t be able to do other heavy usage activities such as watching videos or downloading applications. Before 4pm and after midnight your internet service will continue to run as normal.
When I was about 13 years old, I used to go up to Chabot Observatory to the public show. They usually did some show & tell exhibits indoors and then if the night was clear, went and used their two telescopes. After awhile, they would let me lead parts of the program and it was great fun and education too. Due to that, I ended up taking 4 semesters of astronomy in college.
In the event, Tom offered to have this memorial reading at his house, in the garden, instead of at Nick’s and my house. This seemed appropriate to me because, even though we never spoke of it, I sensed that Leslie was particularly fond of this garden, which has the quality of seeming to be almost in the living room, and that perhaps that was why she had wanted to move to this new house which was only a few blocks from their old one. So Tom and I quickly agreed on this plan and I began sending out emails. At that point the date was only about a week away and I was surprised to find a very high rate of positive response. I was aware that I could have asked many more people than I did but that I was focusing on a particular group who I knew best and who I thought were close to Leslie. The idea had been to keep it small and intimate, and hopefully easy for Tom, and I was happy to see it coming together in that way.
Public outrage broke out after a picture was posted online on April 21 of a dog being dragged along a highway by its leash tied to the rear of a car.
Very long and balanced with elegance and structure, needs 5 years or so for the oak to fully integrate though – 92/100 points.
The 33-year-old driver and father of four called for a ride home from the Cleveland Street taxi stand at 1 a.m. on the 17th, according to the Greenville Police Department file. He was picked up by another defendant, Paul Griggs, who "asked me if I wanted to go with the others to get the Negro being held for stabbing Mr. Brown.
food is certainly a big part of the holidays around here....
I’m driving over the Rocky Mountains into Idaho tomorrow for a weekend-long, middle-school soccer tournament. May not be posting for a few days, as I’ll probably play dead for a while upon returning.
Fill with your favorite Moo Shu filling. I don't have a reliable favorite to share just yet.
28 And even as they did not like to retain God in their knowledge, God gave them over to a debased mind, to do those things which are not fitting; (Romans 1:20-28, New King James Version)
I discovered that I could make ink from the wild grapes still hanging silently from the vines that I had discovered on my walks and I loved gathering and utilizing that rich royal purple. Esculent was my daily calendar word that Sunday - esculent edible ink - silent singing serendipitous simplicity and circles. Alliteration and my art journal...
This is a pretty big resolution, so I'm going to keep my resolution list short with only this goal on it. I do have another project/idea that I'm working on, but it's more a "fun thing to do" rather than a "goal," so it doesn't count. More on that later.
(8) Widespread violence follow the bankruptcies, of both public and private institutions, as the post-WWII generations retired. Extremists dominated the two dominant parties, Democrats and Republicans, rendering impossible any large reforms of public policy. Both parties adopted Lenin’s policy of “the worse, the better”, attempting to discredit the opposition. This was ended only by romance of George Bush IV and Crystal Palin (named after her grandmother). Their story has become legend, and only with difficulty can we determine the facts.
KE: If awakening or living a life in an awakened state does not change the natural order of things, duality,the tension between the opposites, what does living a life in the awakened state do? Does it affect the world, or only one’s subjective experience of the world?
My understanding of the value of mobiles is that they help babies develop their motor skills as well as their sight. As Hudson is now three and a half months old, it was time to move on from the blue seahorse mobile and the blue felted mobile, to a mobile with brighter colours. I wanted it to be stimulating, but not overly so. Then I saw this photo in How to Raise an Amazing Child the Montessori Way and found my inspiration.
pioneers of Buddhist studies in the Occident.
Other lawmakers who have warned the aid is in jeopardy include House Foreign Affairs Committee Chairman Rep. Ileana Ros-Lehtinen (R-Fla.); Rep. Kay Granger (R-Texas), who chairs the House Appropriations Committee’s foreign operations subcommittee; and Sens. John McCain (R-Ariz.), Kelly Ayotte (R-N.H.) and Joe Lieberman (I-Conn.).
Not long after I returned, I got an e-mail from some readers of my blog, a couple who'd just moved here after scouting much of southern Europe for a decent retirement spot. E&J may be retired, but they're sure not slowed down, and we've taken to doing a trip into the surrounding countryside on the average of once a week. Since their interests and mine coincide almost totally, this has been a godsend, because I can neither afford a car nor the $3000 it would cost me to get a French drivers license. I've documented these trips from the first one on, but I've also taken so many pictures that there hasn't been room for most of them.
She bit her lip and he thought she was going to cry. “But I do.”
A very uptempo rock anthem with some killer riffs , soaring vocals and harmony guitars and shredding solo
A: Attorneys have experience writing persuasive documents. It's their job to convince the court, in the teeth of zealous opposition, that their client's case is just. And all legal cases are stories.
* Love is a difficult thing, y'all. I have to say it's the hardest activity I've ever attempted. Getting up every day, deciding to love this person today no matter what the day brings, always trying to put the other ahead of myself, failing, always trying again , being hurt when the other fails or quits...I don't know if it's all worth it. What is the payoff for it all? You just get to do it again tomorrow and every day after that. What's the point of it all?
“It’s disappointing more hasn’t been written on the popular financial sites and in the newspapers about the real threat of a recession happening in 2007. I want my readers to be fully aware of my economic opinion: I wouldn’t be surprised to see the U.S. economy in a recession sometime in 2007. In fact, I expect it.”
In order to mount the 4' long piece of wood, I had my maintenance man cut the bracket that the IKEA shelf was mounted onto in half and then my awesome boyfriend drilled two holes into the wood and VOILA! it was mounted.
Pacing. I tend to either start too fast or too slow – or I get cooking and realize that I’ve glossed over something that I really want to highlight or that I could use more. I have to keep rereading and double-checking myself all the time to make sure everything in a manuscript syncs up.
It is hard to fathom that at age 21 my health will be hindered for the rest of my life and I will be dependent on medication. At the age of 18 I had a Cardiac arrhythmia and spent the night in a hospital bed, thinking why me? How could this have happened? My heart rate was extremely high, my pulse was as high as 200bpm!
While I was reading Levinson’s chapter about YouTube, one of the things that stood out the most to me was the part about John Kerry’s speech. John Kerry gave a speech in 2008 that is considered to be the best speech of his entire life. None of the major television networks aired this speech. The reason that this speech became so popular and was seen by so many people is largely because of YouTube. Even though it was not aired on major television stations, the speech was posted on YouTube only an hour (or less) after it was delivered. In just a few short hours, it had been viewed by thousands of people. So, even though major television stations did not air it, thousands of people had watched John Kerry’s speech in the space of a few hours.
After a short hiatus turned into a much, much longer one, and after a few months of living an (unexcusable) life free from blogging, but consumed by working, the 271 blog is back in business. A big "thank you" to everyone that continued to send e-mails during the break and I hope to reconnect with everyone in the months to come. New posts will be coming soon, and I hope to be firing on all cylinders by next week.
Breakfast Parfait
“When it’s safe to go out again, retrieve the largest stones and freeze them as soon as possible to avoid further melting,” Doesken said. “Use a ruler to get an accurate measure of the diameter and a flexible or strong tape or string to measure the circumference. If an accurate scale is available, weigh the stone. Preserve the stone by tightly wrapping and sealing it in an air-tight bag.”
Sarah gave me the 411 on shopping at Winners, as passed on to her by Katie.
Indeed, Paul had a heavy burden for his fellow Jews, which brought him back to Jerusalem. At the time in question, Paul had come to attend what has become to be known as the great Jerusalem counsel. He came to report to those who attended what God had done among the Gentiles. While there, he went to the temple to pray. Why would he do that?
Something about dirt roads...makes me want to belt out a Dixie Chicks song or something
A: Two. One to change it and another to file a complaint against the manufacturer of the original bulb.
But for now, as well as farewelling a friend and colleague, my mind is focusing on getting organised for Mother’s Day!
-Bijan Rezvani, producer
Back in the early 90's, I baked but still had a lot to learn, only I didn't realize it. Ah, youth. I made the cake for a co-worker's bridal shower and it was a huge hit. It's a bit labor-intensive so I've only made it a handful of times but it always commands the attention of my guests, and devout bakers are struck by the inside cross section and are similarly driven to make it themselves. If you make it, and I hope you will because it's delicious, here are a few things to keep in mind:
Friday, she was taken down for an x-ray to rule out pneumonia. After having fluids overnight she was a totally different kid! She had her energy back and wanted to go home!! We stayed the majority of the day and evening to make sure she could keep down food and liquid then was released to go home around 8pm.
Here is the account of the BC Conservatives refusing my membership and what led me to put in for one again in the first place.
Carbohydrate: 80g
So, to all of my friends at home who called, Facebooked, texted and emailed Birthday wishes, thank you for remembering me. It means a lot!
Another thing that I whipped up just on Friday is a wipe holder. My good friends Lori and Paul welcomed a sweet new addition to their family on 11/1. Their family is now a family of 4 and Amelia and I are going to visit them on Friday afternoon; time better spent instead of fighting crowds for Black Friday "specials". I bought the new baby girl a couple of outfits and of course big brother is getting a little something but I wanted to make a wipe holder too. I ran out of time (and matching fabric) for the pacifier holder. This time I used the quilted pattern instead of the stippled. I like it much better.
I love sponsors!
They bake a lot of different flavors -- their website says 85 -- and different ones are on display each day. Or, you can order a dozen or more of your favorites with 24 hours notice. Each flavor was frosted differently and every one was gorgeous. It was tough to decide which eight to choose (we picked two for each of us -- one for Saturday and one for Sunday). Here's what we eventually selected:
Is what the angel sings
Click the box where the headers appear and select the entire header using Ctrl-A. Open a new email to info@cybersmart.co.za and in the body of the message press Ctrl-V to past the headers into the message.
Well, the New Year is no longer quite so new. It is more than half past the first month. I am already used to writing the new year (2012) on my checks.
Needless to say, there was a flurry of activity, men jumped on horses, out to search for the little skinny kid with one cowboy boot.
Needles
Bloody London,
Vegas or Cancun
With a long list of what he said would be benefits, Bush described the project as his “kind of business” — not income or property tax — and said that the economy could grow this way. “This visionary project will result in new industries and new opportunities.”
Combine balsamic vinegar and honey in a small sauce pan and heat while stirring on medium low to reduce mixture. When the syrup coats the back of a spoon so that it leaves a clean line when swiped with your finger, remove from heat.
While there is still some suspicion that the egg might have been carefully placed in one of the nest scrapes by someone looking to make me look the fool, I am left to eat my words. There is not much more definitive proof of sex than an egg.
Looking back at myself, when I started off in university I can honestly say – I am not the woman today! I was insecure about myself, and my ability to succeed academically, and in life! I took for granted the people in my life, and did not appreciate how wonderful life is, and how amazing I can be if I try!
Its a inexpensive and delicious way to show our apprieciation for all they do throughout the year!
Next Sunday Andrew and I are releasing Whisky & Walking, once it goes live, I'll be posting it here and on Flickr. Try and contain your excitement for a week.
3:00 PM House of Groves
I sat there crying as my doctor touched my knee, handed me a tissue and gave me a piece of paper to give to the receptionist. I took a few minutes to cry out the ugly cry and clean myself up.
½ cup Extra-Virgin olive oil
Kayla slipped out of Kenneth’s hold so fast that the movement didn’t even register on him for another five seconds, before discovering that he was holding onto empty air–along with the rapidly escaping sensation of a warm and supple body.
Thanks for stopping by and thanks for your support! Be sure to leave a comment if you decide to stop by their website. I'd love to know what you think (and what piece of furniture you think I should try out).
July 6 New York, NY Yankee Stadium
Why fire? Well, it’s pretty simple. Men like myself have always stared at fire. Way back in the day when humans were wearing loin cloths and banging rocks together men still stared into the fire. It’s a beautiful thing. The flames seem to draw you in. It’s relaxing.
After much deliberation on what to write about Sun Hee we’ve finally concluded that you can decide for yourself by watching her music video ‘China Wine’. (She is the female singer of this video clip (00:20).)
“Stand up”, Lamar commanded in a loving yet stern tone.
In The Map Of Marvels by David Calcutt, Connor draws a map and finds himself transported into it. The only way home is to follow the adventures the map leads him to. A compelling, Arabian nights type adventure with pirates and shipwrecks, deserts and djinn. It's recommended for older children but is the sort of adventure tale we used to read as bedtime story to our 8 or 9 yr old daughter.
At the start point, I saw many famous running bloggers and also bumped into my cousin, who took part in the 12 km run. It was as if the whole running community was there! The race started at 5:30 am along the relatively mild (flat) Kinrara Golf Club. A few minutes into the race, my MP3 player died…right after Moves Like Jagger. I didn’t feel right having the mute headphones stuck to my ears and decided to slow down to remove them before resuming my first silent race. But that was okay, really. Throughout the race, I’d seen runners waving and wishing each other a happy new year. I even heard someone saying Gong Hei Fatt Choi. That’s the reason why I like small-scale races like this. They are more intimate and enjoyable.
Making the bug/fairy houses was easy and fun. While I gathered paper lunch bags, scissors, and glue, E walked around the yard and collected flowers, leaves, and berries to decorate the houses.
Sure, some people may have been open to hearing what I had to say, and then after hearing, decide to stay on that road anyway. But some were longing to find out what was going on, craning their heads and were just waiting for that news to come – to tell them that the way they were heading lead to suffering, and on hearing the news, let them decide that they needed to turn back, or find some other way.
It was past 3am when everyone returned to the camp. The whole field was alight with moonlight by then. One couldn’t see many birds during the day in this part of Africa, but at night one could hear sweet sounds of a nocturnal bird. That bird sang from a tree. Shankar wasn’t sleepy. Everyone went to bed, everyone was tired. But the bonfire was lit again. Shankar did go back to his tent though — it would have been stupid to stay outside. But he just couldn’t sleep.
Now, speaking of AA Hubby trying, while he didn’t succeed at getting me a non-returnable gift with the standing lamp, he did take me by complete surprise with another gift that isn’t going anywhere! It’s staying right here. Naturally, there is more to this story, but I think I’ll save it for another post. The story’s a real gem.
2 C flour
Then, we headed back to the bus, and made it just in time. We collected the kids, and went back home to get ready for Ice skating. CPT got home at the same time as we did, and he took an advanced party to the skating rink. Eme and Joe and Leo and Paul and CPT headed out to go skating, and I followed behind with Tom and Jim and and Jake and Carol. We were so slow that Jake was off of the bus! hehe. It was his first time getting to go skating this year :) He was mildly excited for it.
Back in April, I took advantage of the Ching Ming holiday and went to Shaoguan for a three-day weekend. Madam Cheng and I took the ferry to Pan Yu, then hailed a cab for the 20-minute ride to the train station in Guangzhou.
Calories are a measure of energy. A calorie is defined as the amount of energy it takes to heat one ml of water by one degree Celsius.
The first pub I visited was the free house '5 Arches Tavern'. A pub with dark corners, stone columns and nooks abound, it had 2 pumps with Brains Bitter and Theakstons Black Bull which I chose. It was creamy, almost nitro 'smooth' apart from the temperature, an okay start.
There is talk of reputations and we are all guilty of jumping to conclusions about people. Do you think your characters are more critical of themselves or of others?
Dear Teen Me continues to host and post amazing authors with amazing letters to their teen-selves. Be sure not to miss Sara Zara's letter. Sara was one of our first Hunger Mountain contributors and this year she will be offering a 50 page critique as part of the Hunger Mountain/VCFA E-bay Auction later this spring. (More critique-rs will be announced soon--but the growing list includes some top agents, authors, and we're hoping for an illustrator or two.)
To secure the tufting, you can use short pieces of dowel rods or even large washers. Place your piece of dowel between the two pieces of twine and pull one end over and under to hold it lightly in place. Now pull TIGHTLY to get your tufted look, and tighten down your dowel rod. To tie it off I just tied it in a bow - no knots. This way you could untie the tufting and remove the buttons if, God forbid, the slipcover gets filthy and needs to be washed. I've not had any issues with the tufting loosening.
Maybe one day hats will be fashionable again in the U.S.
Edie Brickell and New Bohemians
Use a spare paper strip to create the lip of the basket by attaching a fabric strip to it and attaching it to the body of the basket.
You know how we all have those random things we collected, intentionally or not, as teens? Some more embarrassing than others? Well today, Aurora Undefined author Kate Hinderer has been kind enough to share her teen things, in the form of what we'd find in a garage sale of items from her teenage years.
Next, I sampled a pint of Barrio’s Red Cat Amber (which gets its name from the fact that Tucson is home to the U of A Wildcats, I guess). The Red Cat Amber was darker than the Copperhead Pale (rightly so) and seemed more hoppy to me, though their website indicates otherwise. It also had a slightly thicker mouth feel and struck me as closer to an IPA than the Copperhead oddly enough. The Red Cat was sweet and not as dry as the Copperhead Pale Ale.
Hello everyone! Finally on the last day of my working week, it has been quite a week and I am so looking forward to having a 2 day break, then all I have to do is work another day and I have the weekend all to myself...new goodies arrived yesterday and I am so hoping to have a little play and possibly create a video..
Never take me at face value because my expressions change.
I want the heifer next to me not to look at my shoes and match them to me later. I try not to look at other women’s shoes, while handling my business, but I do. I haven’t matched a person yet, but if I did, I’d laugh.
Her most successful recording was actually not a musical tune, but rather an audio CD for Big Finish’s Dr Who Adventure Omega, released in 2003! Though at times hard to follow for someone not too familiar with the good Doctor, this CD is nonetheless a Must for Caroline Munro Fans as this is by far the best acting she ever did. It’s hard to believe that this is the lady who was dubbed in most of her important roles. Caroline really takes very well to the audio medium and I would sure love to hear more from her in that kind of production. Her voice is amazing: soothing, sexy, ironic, stern, whatever it needs to be. And to think that she was worried about the production because of her dyslexia is unbelievable. Her performance is nothing short but a revelation. The CD is still available from Amazon UK.
I used some Basic Grey Christmas papers which I think were last years or the year before's?!
I laughed but also felt a little sheepish. I need to be patient, and also appreciate what I have already received. I also have this feeling that any money I receive will be through my own efforts, and not some random windfall. This is not a bad thing, though, as money is a strong motivator to keep me producing artwork. This doesn’t fit the romantic stereotype of the emotionally driven artist, but it’s the truth.
I think by the time E and the B started we'd finally found everyone. Another solid show, but nothing fantastic. Nosegref, Crack, and I left just when they started cranking through the hits so we could get to Emo's for Zox.
It's film for those who haven't seen very many European westerns, or for the hardest hardcore fans of these movies... the rest of us would be better off with something featuring Clint Eastwood & Lee Van Cleef or Bud Spencer & Terrence Hill.
How Time Flies - Rover Records Source #4
I amuse myself by making Find Me, Stanley. Homage to David Livingstone.
Since the beginning, Christian theologians have been arguing over it. Free will or predestination? Do we choose our actions, or are we just pawns on a Great Chessboard, bandied about by the hand of Another?
This was my chef, the guy who looked after the breakfast at the Hotel and I was his commis!!
By Laurie Goodstein
Up for a road trip? John Raines of Boxwood Home in Rehoboth contacted me to let me know that ten interior and landscape designers have transformed a 3200 sq. foot 1920's cottage home inside and out to benefit the Village Improvement Association. Love John's mix of scale with the pieces in this bedroom and the contrast of light and dark - gorgeous!
Ingrid Bacci has authored best-selling books, CD's and DVD's on self-healing and is a respected healer. She is a former professor and graduate of Harvard and Columbia Universities. Ingrid wrote the following about this work.
Afraid of ruining her chance to escape her mother's scheming through an advantageous marriage, Violet must keep her ability secret. The only person who can help her is Colin, a friend she's known since childhood, and whom she has grown to love. He understands the true Violet, but helping her on this path means they might never be together. Can Violet find a way to help this ghost without ruining her own chance at a future free of lies?
(So much hating lately, my apologies)
I don’t complain. Mr. Springsteen can visit whenever and as often as he likes. However some of the reporters at the newspapers here are starting to complain a bit about the many times Springsteen and his band have visited Sweden during the last decade. They all seem to long for the times when it used to be many years between the few shows he performed here. At that time – the 1970′s and 1980′s – Springsteen was climbing towards and was at his creative peak and obviously now he is on the way down. That doesn’t mean he is not making any new good music, he still is, but it is no longer as great as it used to be. His live act has not suffered as much though. Bruce Springsteen is still among the best live performers ever to set foot on a stage. So I think it is great he is touring again so soon. Not that I can afford to see his show this year either, but I am happy for all those who will be able to.
To luncheon at the Cannon Street Hotel
The Angel Intuition Deck is very positive and designed for use as both an Angel Healing deck and Tarot Deck. Although it is not directly connected to the major and minor arcana, it does comprise of 78 cards. These cards can be used to give a reading and can be placed in any of the suggested formations, which are the Single Card, the Three-Card Draw or the Celtic Cross.
“No. Yes! Susan, you know I don’t wear anything pink. Change it to gray.” Then his eyes bugged. “Jesus! You gave me red shoes with bows on them. You made me look gay! Are you trying to be funny?”
The VeganMania team completely dominated the event, obliterating the concoction in 6:52, or slightly more than half the time of the nearest competitor. In fact, when officials shut down the competition after 22 minutes, only three teams had finished at all.
As well as details of one’s farm, the questionnaire solicited comments on crime, the environment, whether the police were involved in solving crime, and a section called “details”. The devil is in the details in this instance! It was under “details” that the real story of the North West’s turmoil was revealed. Mrs. Louise Viljoen (not her real name) is the owner of a North West farm. In October 2000, her husband was murdered in his study by five young black men. They took nothing. The five men were from Alexandra Township, near Sandton in Gauteng. (Mrs. Viljoen believes the killers were especially brought in for the job). They cut the telephone lines and looked for her to attack as well, but she managed to escape. They knew the house’s layout well.
Whew.
I relunctantly return home to the quiet empty of the one bedroom apartment I share with my mother. Miss the chaos in Houston.
Ya, I feel a little vain for taking all these pictures of myself, but I guess it's just because I know I won't be preggo much longer. I really want to remember how I looked at the end!
ummm, we really should've double checked our sources.
On the other hand, if you like it, but believe only the bands from the 60's and 70's could deliver it, then I give you a new hope, The Right Ons!
And then one day she woke up.
And while the AU is still in a formative state, it’s already officially designated by an emblem, a flag, an anthem, a central bank, and unified continental military force.
"Ryan's dead," he exclaims before sitting and putting his head between his knees to control the dizziness. He's feeling seasick and reaches for the waste paper bin before emptying the contents of his stomach.
Now, helpless in the hollow of
(Fifth in a series of reflections on the church of my boyhood)
OCTOBER 3rd - HAPPY 25TH BIRTHDAY TO MY SON MATT!!! yikes!
dining room table.
our bossy little sisters
Two friends went out to play golf and were about to tee off, when one fellow noticed that his partner had but one golf ball.
Yossarian: “Why are they going to disappear him?”
Anti-union stands by Romney, Kasich could help White House
If someone came across to talk about Jesus, I am sure the sheriff would have let the debate continue without interference.
I had to put the brakes on that thought rather quickly!!
At the same time, the software industry has gained a reputation for creating high tech sweat shops, where developers are consistently chastised for being late, for creating bugs, for costing too much and the punishment is to require them to spend long, late hours and weekends making good their sins. How can it be that all developers are late, incompetent at creating bug-free software and expensive? That cannot be true. So the industry has developed a culture of making every corporate and commercial failing ultimately fall on the programmers’ shoulders. For this, they are paid relatively poorly, compared to other young professionals. Who would aspire to work in such an environment?
Green spoons
Target weight 9st 2lb. Today 9st 3lb. Lets face it the only way is up for the next few weeks, lol.
The ConDem coalition government, and PM Cameron in particular, have promoted the concept of the Big Society. This is portrayed as the state stepping back to allow civil society to willing shoulder social responsibilities.
Finally, I just tasted a Xingu from Brazil. This was a schwarzbier style which I found odd coming out of Brazil? But, it was really intriguing to me. The beer had a syrupy consistency which may be good for a single, but I could not have had more than that. But, it was good enough that I would have rated it a 3 or so just because it intrigued me so much.
If a weekend of writing, reflecting and enjoying the tastes and flavours of Bangalow isn't enticement enough, Sample magazine - the epicurean bible of the Northern Rivers - has offered to publish the best travel article written over the weekend in the travel section of the spring edition of the magazine. So not only will you experience what it takes to be a travel writer, you might even get published.
Cantor: Obama caused the recession in 2007
I finished both my VSVs just after 2pm, so Andy gave me a crack at writing a pack (something I hadn’t done in a few weeks). The pack was on the North Queensland Tourism Awards that were held on the Friday night gone. Writing intros to packs are quite easy, but I’ve discovered my main issue comes from writing the first two sentences in the SOT (which is the main body of the story). Reef HQ and Remote Area Dive were both inducted into the Hall of Fame for winning an award in a certain category for the third year in a row, while lots of other local business won awards and were acknowledged for excellence in service in tourism during a tough economic time.
I love the heat of a proper good summer, but the gardener in me acknowledges that the ground could use a good soaking. Nearly every night, I'm outside watering the borders until the light begins to ebb and I can feel the damp chill rising from the earth.
And so they send those manuscripts to me, hoping that somehow I'll be willing to overlook the fact that their first electronic rights have been burned irrevocably. And because I'm a sucker, I'll request the whole book. And without exception, those books aren't in any condition to be turned over to my staff for editing much less out there on display for the whole world. Out of those submissions, I have not accepted one.
"Uh huh."
“Actually,” he says, “I have most of it right here on my tablet.”
If you're from Wisconsin, you've certainly heard of Johnsonville brats. In fact, you probably cut your first molar on a Johnsonville brat. They're all I ever buy, so when I happened upon this recipe on Facebook (Bobby Deen recipe video) I thought, "Awesome--A new twist on the traditional brat!" and decided to try it. [This is NOT a compensated review--I'm just doing it for fun, because we liked it a lot! Oh, and for the record, brat rhymes with "cot," not "cat."]
hearts beating
This is a simple forest green cotton that I had in my stash. I made this pattern once before in a hot pink linen blend, while I was pregnant and Karen’s Pyjama Party Sew-A-Long inspired me to pull them out, rip them, and resew them into a wearable muslin (minus 6″ in the hip! Hurray!). Then I made the pattern adjustments and cut these out. I think another pair or two will move this pattern into TNT status. Honestly they are probably already there, I just need to transfer a few tweaks back to the paper pattern.
Write out your pain and then ask God to use it for His Glory.
Perhaps the best description I can think of for Anvil! is that it’s a cross between This is Spinal Tap and American Movie. But while there are plenty of laughs in Anvil! - some of which the subjects are probably unaware of – the movie is more about struggle and dedication, and less about laughing at talentless, self-deluded hacks. Steve “Lips” Kudlow and Robb Reiner, the heart and soul of the metal band Anvil, have been at it for 30 years, with one big flashpoint in the early 80’s and a lot of playing at sports bars and in European dungeons for ten or twelve people a show. Though they occasionally show signs of giving up the rock n’ roll dream, they remain committed to staying together, making music, and hoping for that big break.
Fast-forward many years later, never forgetting the experience and wistfully thinking that a door that had once opened itself to me was now impossibly shut. However, to my great joy and for reasons I will not get into quite yet, the sensations returned. This time around, I was able to follow and feel the intensity of the vibrations back to the spine. Oh…my…God! Again, the feelings began very gently, but then built up into a crescendo of convulsive contortions of the body accompanied by hissing breaths…and yet with unimaginable sensations of pleasure and bliss!
The Lightning Thief – Riordan
So holding the snow's hand she let it twirl her, gracefully gliding over the dance floor, a long and breathless pirouette, right into the oncoming lane, across to the further curb, which we struck not fast, but hard, so that our bones rang with it. The truck thought about rolling over, but decided not to, and dropped back to all four paws with a thump.
Will the other side of April
Just added some Holly buttons to finish.
The only other way that I can see to prevent Swap Sadness is to include some form of public humiliation, like a special blog where people can post pictures of the shit they got in a swap. Swap Flops, or something. (Note to self: this could work. Nab that URL now!)
* END
More than 8,500 acid attacks, forced marriages and other forms of violence against women were reported in Pakistan in 2011, according to The Aurat Foundation, a women’s rights organization.
Pray for the peace of Jerusalem: “May those who love you be secure.
With plenty of automatic scene modes, I believe that if you're after a compact digital camera, Fuji Z1 should be taken into account.
The aftermath
Technology is a wonderful thing.
A violent upheaval sends him to the US. In Carolina, he remakes himself in America’s hopeful image and finds an extraordinary use for his talents of observation. But political winds continue to volley him between north and south, in a story that turns many times on the unspeakable breach – the lacuna – between truth and public presumption.
05.Lick my Shiny Boots
“I'm on to you,” I muttered.
lost in thought
As you peered at the doomed and haggard faces of your men?
Who's coming to help? I'll supply the margaritas! ;)
Where are you now, where do you want to go, what do you need to get there? What's getting in your way, and why? Many questions indeed, which require much time and self-examination to answer. There are no easy answers, sometimes there are no answers directly forthcoming at all. Sometimes even the questions themselves seem incomprehensible. It's all OK, all that is really needed is the willingness and the ability to look back in to your life to see what's going on, what you would like to achieve and how you think you might be able to bring them about. Try something, anything. If it doesn't work, try something else, just be honest and open about what you're doing and move on.
Father: "Sigh"
Soon the time comes and the train arrives.
Anyone care to join me?
I know why I worry though. The kid is an only child at the moment (fingers crossed that gets changed at some point!), and he's reaching the age for Kindergarten, so a lot of kids he knows will be disappearing into schools come August. We're very firm in our desire to homeschool the kid, but the omnipresent question of "socializing" hangs over us because of outsiders' worries. Plus the kid is simply a very outgoing kid, and I don't want to do anything to stop that since I'm such a shy introvert myself. And it's not like I'm thinking that I could change such an inborn trait, but I want to fulfill that part of him as much as I can.
Sadly, I had to take off early to get Jason to the airport for a trip. So, I left before lunch and booked it back to my office to pick up my stuff and catch the train. And when I say booked it, I mean it. I didn’t really budget enough time and had less than 20 minutes to run 2 miles. It’s been a while since I pushed the pace like that but I still managed to bust out two sub-9:00 miles. Woo hoo! These legs still have some speed in them yet.
o Threats of violence
With my deadline looming, I've gone into panic mode. This is not a pretty sight. Panic mode means surly, snappy, nasty, cranky, touchy, and just downright mean behavior. On top of it all, it means the twitch in my left eye has come back. But for the twitchiness, I might have had a chance for passing for normal.
"Oh, yeah? What'd ya do that for?"
They illuminate the sky in a skillful way
And every now and then,
11. Doctor 3
Joseph’s story is a great representation to that kind of a surprisingly strong and persevering faith. He didn’t expect his life to be smooth and void of trouble. Perhaps he realized that his life was not just about its destination, but about the journey itself and more importantly, about who was with him on that journey— God. As we look closer in the story we realize that Joseph relied so much on God, he was the source for his faith and strength. He knew God so well, that nothing shook him, nothing made him grow bitter or resentful, but everything drove him to be wiser and more patient.
where my Lady Spring did hide,
Sherry has lived with her family in a sealed bunker since things went wrong up above. But when they run out of food, Sherry and her dad must venture outside. There they find a world of devastation, desolation...and the Weepers: savage, mutant killers.
I know that there are republicans who say they are representing the will of the people by blocking issues from coming up in Congress. Someone explain to me how the "super majority" of 60 votes is representative of the will of the people. It in fact drives minority rule to the extreme. One senator can command payoffs by withholding his vote. If the filibuster is a tactic in the Senate, then I think they should actually have to filibuster, the old fashioned way. Senators take the floor, hold the floor, through the night, through the day until finally one side has to negotiate a position as the business of the Senate is simply not going to happen until the issue is resolved. The way the filibuster rule works now, it has just added a layer obstruction to the work of the Senate. At least under the old method nothing got done as long as senators held the floor. Now, they just have a vote and go on to obstruct other important work.
Here are a few truths for you.
I just finished having a good laugh,
I received the product mentioned above for free to facilitate this review. Regardless, I only recommend products or services I use personally and believe will be good for my readers. I am disclosing this in accordance with the Federal Trade Commissions 16 CFR, Part 255 Guides Concerning the Use of
I lived inside a jar,
"I once loaned Maila a copy of Carl Jung’s Man and His Symbols. In particular, I wanted her to read the chapter on the “anima,” Jung’s term for female archetypes – witches, goddesses, vampires, saints, etc. – that are actually fantasy projections of the inner male psyche, i.e., of the male’s unacknowledged feminine aspects. (When a woman does it, the projection is known as an “animus.”) After returning the book Maila declared, “I am an anima.” - C. Jerry Kutner (BLAD 1/11/08)
13 Angels and Devils
Think long lines of traumatised refugees getting machine gunned by ground attack aircraft. Think destruction of anything that doesn’t contain precious metals, make sure you grab those, from their jaws especially.
Shall you not know it?
For a Premium Rush tell The Dictator on the Battleship just What to Expect When You’re Expecting to see The Apparition haunting The Best Exotic Marigold Hotel. After all, you’ve got ParaNorman and Magic Mike exorcising The Possession and no Dark Shadows will faze Abraham Lincoln, Vampire Hunter in the Cold Light of Day.
RENEE!!
-Water purification & shelf-life extension…CS bottling now illegal in the EU except when labeled for this use
Now, I like to think that change can be good, but if it ain’t broke, then don’t fix it, yes? Apparently not. A few new folks on the island have decided that things will work more efficiently with a stricter set of “guidelines.” This bothers me, a lot, and I can’t quite determine why since what is being suggested might well be a good thing for all. Still, I just can’t get the image out of my head of missionaries and their “good intentions.” You know what I mean. “It’s our duty to show these savages the right path.” Not sure who I’m paraphrasing there, but my intent is clear, I hope.
Today’s post isn’t really about rhubarb, though. I was just wasting time, trying to tease out some cogent words. One of my “followers,” Bernard Saint, sent me an e-mail yesterday and asked when I planned to start writing about gardening again. He didn’t say so, but the implication was that he might be a little bit tired of hearing about Uncle Bob, Moxie, the Red Sox, and rain barrels.
p.s. Astoria Rose laughed for the first time on Sunday!!!! It was in Relief Society and she laughed 3 or 4 times. On the 4th laugh she had all the other sisters laughing with her!
Begin again, P.
Education: It’s very difficult to get a good education when you’re consistently under/poorly-nourished and are constantly moving. Combine this with parents who are perhaps illiterate and don’t understand any of what you’re being taught (meaning they can’t help you with homework) and you’re beginning to understand the problems many young refugee children have to work around. Besides that, sometimes the material is so functionally-racist by choosing to focus only on western history to the exclusion of everything else. Obviously, emphasizing western history makes sense, this being a western country, however, if the goal of history is to help us understand the mistakes of the past in order that we avoid them, isn’t there just as much to be gained in studying African history? Or are we afraid that seeing such ugly western imperialism might sour our children on the world they grow up in? It’s a difficult, complicated issue that is seldom appreciated as it deserves to be.
Do you find it easy to forgive and forget?
A slice of Billy’s Banana Cake is heavy. Not only because it’s ginormous but also because the cake is dense and moist, and the frosting (cream cheese frosting—the better to temper those sugar jitters) is spread unabashedly thick. This is serious stuff. Made with fresh ripened bananas and the goodness of unrestrained dairy like butter and eggs, this two-layer cake is Billy’s most popular. But don’t worry, you shouldn’t be caught short: the bakery churns out a few every day. And if you want to go really bananas, you can special order your own.
While an apple a day is known for keeping the doctor away, researchers suggest going to work on an egg everyday could be the best way to start the day. For, they say, it can also keep unwanted intake of calories at bay. According to a Surrey University study, the first of its kind in Britain, eating eggs for breakfast can help slash the calories eaten at lunch and dinner. They keep us fuller for longer compared with other common breakfast foods. The researchers suggest, eggs are also better for people who want to resist afternoon snacks on biscuits, cake or chocolate.Wouldn't it be funny if the health advice given by the DoH in 2007 had actively contributed to the 'obesity epidemic' they keep blaming us for?
Hiebert, a strategic analyst for the sheriff’s intelligence-led policing division, told Lt. Brian Prescott, a 21-year veteran deputy. Prescott jumped up from his desk and ran down the stairwell, into the parking lot.
I am proud to be from a long line of military men and women. Fletchers have served in every major conflict on which the USA has engaged. I don’t care what you think about the merits of conflict(s), but their sacrifice protected your right to voice your thoughts.
"Change it, That's boring man"
Zander who is a SPONGE when it comes to learning drinks up anything he hears from Kiah & Brucey.
Saurfang:
Disadvantages of Hydroelectric Dams
Oh, and today's photo prompt is bottle...
The authors also oversimplify their model when they describe African Americans as sub-Saharan Africans with European admixture. There has also been Amerindian admixture, as noted by Myrdal (1944, p. 124):
My little sweetheart and I will be using these during the week before Valentine’s Day. :)
even ANY alternative (such as Prachathai) media: radio stations, mobile phone MSM networks, etc.
I did receive this through the post though:
Bel Canto Paradise N
cheeks of the bar; after hours
Self:When do the cows go outside?
I’ve also picked up motorbiking. And I love it. I adapted to Hanoi traffic quite quick, and even made it to the city center where there are as much motorbikes as there are bikes in Amsterdam. It is more fun outside the cities though, through paddy-rice fields and along the rivers.
At what point on this scale does the God give man the soul? We have no way really of knowing, self awareness certainly becomes a factor early on in the scale, does that mean the soul is entered there? At what point then are we God's design?
My Favorite Line
*I don't know what caused the line to go across the top of the pic. :(
A lot of designs are currently available in the market. For formal occasions, people prefer to use white napkins, because they look elegant and it works well with the occasion. With children, they use those with prints, because it’s more colorful and attractive. If you want, you can also have these things customized; this is common in weddings and debuts. You can pretty much acquire what you prefer, because a lot of options are available in the market.
The sand on our feet flows
Navien has requested installers to inspect any Navien water heaters manufactured through the end of December 2008 to ensure all collar and exhaust sections are fused appropriately. The company has stated that application of ULC S636 compliant cement - in accordance with the cement manufacturer's instructions - will be required for collar and exhaust sections improperly fused. Navien stated it has tested and approved the use of IPEX System 636 and Royal Group GVS-65 cements for fusing Navien water heater collars to PVC venting pipes. Navien have
KUALA LUMPUR — The much anticipated and sold-out concert of uber teeny-bopper Youtube sensation Justin Bieber in Malaysia was unexpectedly cut short after the Canadian singer’s voice finally broke, and he became a man.
Fair enough, I suppose, and the paper said that that the Abbey beer resembles the well-known Belgian Trappist beers, which makes it sound really interesting. But then the crunch. They go on to say that it is of higher quality than the Trappist beers due to being brewed according to the Reinheitsgebot. I almost wept. Lars, however, made a very good point that this was a "lovely unintentional parody of German attitude to Reinhetsgebot." And he's right, of course. How could you not love this neck-like-a-jockey's-bollox attitude that a beer type, so beloved of so many people, could be improved by application of the Reinheitsgebot.
So, you can see how this culture of agriculture is actually an all out war against All Life. I hope you can see that...But don't worry, because if you don't, you'll always have "hope"...and "vote" because as you know, you do live in a democracy, hey, 'you' have power, no!?.
Christan: How have you used your suffering to help other women deal with their own infertility and loss?
General comment: The label says it is blended with "new type" malt whisky. If that means it young, it certainly tastes it.
but it sounds very large and I don't want to know what it is
How about Paul? What did he have to say about himself both before and after he became a Christian? I am not remembering everything Paul ever said, but a few things do come to my mind. If anything comes to your mind (anything Paul ever said that you remember) that would have bearing… please feel free to share your thoughts. Here are some things that come to my mind:
NYU's summer Career Exploration Program will operate Monday through Thursday, July 6– July 29, from 9:30am to 3:00pm. During this time, students will not only have the unique opportunity to investigate careers that appeal to their interest, but they will also be able to develop the skills necessary to excel in these professions as well.
Anyway, the idea is you get dropped off at a prearranged location, head out into the wilderness, and (hopefully) arrive at another prearranged location a few days later to be picked up. Maps and compasses are not allowed, so you have to navigate by landmarks (it helps to know the terrain by studying the map in advance). If you're lucky, you find a stream or lake and catch fish to eat. If you're unlucky, you survive on edible plants. As "luck" would have it, I planned our location in such a way as to all but assure that we would stumble across a creek with lots of fish and drinkable water. Again, they're just boys, and we didn't want anyone getting dehydrated or starving to death, so I kind of planned it so "luck" would be on our side (just don't tell the boys...)
Rick Santorum....another great guy & a staunch Conservative but too rigidly religious in his message to reel in the independent voters and those on the Right who are simply not religious people. The Left sank him via his anti-abortion and anti-gay righteousness and Romney sank him with negative ads once he started losing states to Rick. Dude came across as a sweater-vested Mister Rogers to me though, too nice to defeat the Left in 2012.
to this one little boy.
all about alex
SUCH AS:
Grape Man 2: “Oh that. Fuck. Fucking council…”
She bounded down stairs and out of the house. She headed towards the apple tree .She looked around at her branches then knelt down on the ground to see if he left a trap but she didn’t find any .She dug into the ground to make sure he didn’t hide any. When she got on her feet something attracted her attention, some scratches on the apple tree ,she could figure out her cat’s name. He’s recording the names of his victims .She picked up a stone from the ground and started erasing violently his scratches.
There is no link to the contest website. Please just reply back to this post with your contest response and you will be entered into the contest.
I had, what I thought, was a pretty well thought out and balanced breakfast only to have a borderline high blood sugar the other morning only to think back and realize that I had been sipping on some coffee with milk in it which may have been carb enough to cause the elevation. Timing is important.
Should rarely ever use
Are you cooperating or competing with your team. Cooperating wins competing loses.
I probably looked like a schoolboy playing hooky, which, as far as life is concerned, I am. Here I am clashing blacks and blues as usual, although for once, not anywhere on my skin. I was in NYC on business recently, but busy as I was, I managed to find an afternoon to explore the brick and mortar offerings of some our better known catalog companies (see below).
The businesses we trade with every day are the few experiments that worked. For each one, there were likely dozens or maybe even hundreds that failed.
And mine, my only son and pride
Within this minimalist context, Rollin makes the supernatural seems utterly concrete and physical. When Pierre's father is attacked at the climax by a group of supernatural beings, they parade towards the camera looking like a band of hippies, led by a kid who's obviously (and comically) struggling to hold a black flag aloft. Similarly, when Pierre enters a chateau where he hopes to learn the secrets he's been chasing, he's confronted by a calm, utterly normal old couple who usher him towards his fate. After Pierre is gone, Rollin stays with the old couple, who seem lonely and slightly melancholy, always waiting in this empty house for visitors seeking answers, always left alone again when they depart. The camera tracks away from them, pulling back to emphasize their loneliness, a moment of surprising emotion, one sign of the strange sadness that lingers at the fringes of this film. Rollin has a feel for such quirky moments, like when two of Georges' assistants walk away through a field in a long shot, chatting, and refreshingly seeming as baffled about what's going on as the audience likely is.
The current Ohio Attorney General returned the complaint stating that allegations of Election fraud must be referred to the AG by the Secretary of State, despite an elaborate mechanism at the Attorney Generals website designed for just such filing. Former Attorneys General Marc ("do as I say, not as I do") Dann, and Nancy ("I'm just filling in") Rogers ignored the complaint entirely. Per the current Attorney Generals reply, the complaint was forwarded once again to the Ohio Secretary of State where it is currently allegedly “under review” as of this date.
A second article written recently also adds worry that the anti-evolution movement is gathering pace worldwide. It lists a couple of examples of how evolution is being attacked. One case is that in Kenya, a bitter dispute is taken place as the plan of exhibiting a prehistoric human skeleton is being opposed by local religious forces. Another example involves a well-funded Turkish publishing house mass-distributing anti-evolution books to French speaking schools and universities across Europe. The article also shows an example from Russia, and of course, there is the well-known Intelligent Design movement that is currently taking place in the US.
Renderings released with the relaunch of the Barclays Center web site show "street to seat brand domination" that is somehow absent from Frank Gehry's new AY renderings.
It was so much fun for me to see what was on the bus each time it came.
Double Peanut Butter Cookies
above crowded Ponto Cho
All this flower making was jolly good fun!!!
I stamped my little giraffe-totin’ girl with Memento Tuxedo Black ink on Neenah Classic Crest Cover, Solar White Smooth, 130lb paper, paper pieced her pants, and otherwise colored her with Copic markers. Then I cut her out with one of my amazing Die-namics Oval STAX dies, sponged the edges, and layered her on Die-namics Fishtail Flags STAX and Die-namics Oval Open Scallop Doily die cuts. I’ve loved the canvas Die-namics Loopy Bloom that I’ve been seeing and have been wanting to try one myself. I thought this card was the perfect time to do it and I love how the canvas ravels! Then I added some twine and some Die-namics Royal Leaves, also from canvas. The sentiment, from the Sweet Safari Sentiments set, was stamped on a Die-namics First Place Award Ribbon die cut and attached under the flower.
"Time for Livin'" by The Association
There were, of course, other facets to this vast investment in rites of commemoration: Māvīrar Nal on 27 November every year served as a means of legitimizing the Eelam project and the de facto LTTE state, while also inspiring the Tamil people in ways that encouraged mobilisation. It implanted firm bonds between Tigers, the Eelam cause and people. By 2001 there were 21 immaculately maintained tuyilam illam, or “resting places” for the Tiger fallen.[iii] They were widely regarded as “holy places” and “temples.”[iv] My photographs of the preparations for Māvīrar Nal at tuyilam illam at Kopay and Vadamarachy, as well as indelible memories of the vast concourse of perhaps 60,000 people at the tuyilam illam at Murrippu south of Kilinochchi in late November 2004, highlight the degree to which the sites were profound symbols for the Sri Lankan Tamils associated with the LTTE’s Eelam project.
The leaders discovered that they couldn’t kick the can over the hill – it just kept rolling slowly back down the hill towards the town. And this magic can didn't just roll along the road like an ordinary can – the stimulus money vanished in a puff of
It happened on a quiet street, VERY close to home and I didn't die... good
I have a meeting tomorrow. Have brought along a packet of Tim Tams for afternoon tea.
You’ll have to excuse me. I have to decide what I’m going to wear for our grandson’s second birthday party.
adapted from the endless resource we call the internet
What do you think about soul contracts?
Ruby was in the backyard hanging clothes she had her red hair tied back. She saw us
"So you kept this doll a big secret. Why?" demanded Sam.
Traffic impacts: During construction, existing US 10 will remain open to one lane in each direction. Motorists should be alert for trucks crossing and slow moving vehicles. Crews are planning the following local road closures:
With what he had planned—with what the ghosts were asking of him—he’d most likely be back home by Sunday. Today would be the hardest part. Truth be told, he wasn’t looking forward to it. He had played out the day in his mind several times last night before finally retiring to bed. He was sure that he’d make it through the day without a hitch, but there was still something unsettling about what the next few hours would bring.
The point here is this, when you eat healthy, exercise even in small bursts, and don’t abuse your body with substances never meant for human consumption, you are telling the Universe that you respect your body and want it to be healthy. Your body will respond in kind and you will begin to raise your energy vibration which sends signals to the Universe, then the Universe sends back equal energy vibrations of respect for your body. The results are the eating healthy, exercising and respecting your body get easier and you start to look and feel better.
“Now that I, your Lord and Teacher, have washed your feet, you also should wash one another’s feet. I have set you an example that you should do as I have done for you. Very truly I tell you, no servant is greater than his master, nor is a messenger greater than the one who sent him. Now that you know these things, you will be blessed if you do them.” (John 13:14-17)
"Did you do something different to your hair?"
I love your comments! Unfortunately your comment does not count as an entry, so be sure to enter as stated above, and then leave a comment!
I just realized it's been 4 days since my last confession, er, blog post.
As an artist you have to take it in and realize that just because you were rejected or lost an award doesn’t mean that you aren’t good, it just means that it wasn’t right, and all you can do is reflect and push forward.
Some of the island looks like this.
Lastly the wing continues to exploit a solution used by Williams all season. The wing is notionally a three element design, with a main plane and two flaps. However an extra slot is formed in the outer span of the main plane and this formed effectively a four element for more highly loaded outer section. You can see the depth and length of the wing in this outer is greater than the other sections of wing, so this area creates the highest amount of downforce.
To discern the dynamic conscience of the collective
It's a double standard that we have a National Association for the Advancement of Colored People, but don't you DARE call them colored people, because only they can do that.....and if we have the same association to promote White People, we're racists. One dares not say the word "negro" anymore because it's racist, but those kids don't seem to mind getting scholarship money from the United Negro College Fund. I myself got college money from the US Army because I couldn't find a United Caucasian College Fund...oh, wait; that'd be racist.
Six days later, 14-year-old Abigaille Giamporcaro of Canton was dead.
Why am I on the Vicodin, you ask? Because I, while getting up from the floor whilst cleaning my cabinets, picked up my 20 lber aka Mac on Sunday morning and did something fierce to my back. I honestly thought the pain from the last month of pregnancy was enough to break me, but that was nothing compared to this pain. How I have managed to work through this is beyond me, but I am a warrior! I can barely walk when I first get up and then while walking, I get lovely spasms that take my breath away. I went to my chiropractor yesterday and he believes I have a bulging disc. He adjusted me and then they proceeded to give me 6 anti-inflammatory injections and then a massage. Nothing changed. Last night, I took matters into my own hands and broke out the leftover V that I had from my c-section. I tell you, that helped a lot. But I also think it just helped that I wasn't sitting non-stop, as I have to do at work. Today, I woke up not feeling much better. Came into work for a bit and then went back to the Chiro. I was basically hoping he would magically fix me, but alas, I'm still in lots of pain. I do feel about 10% better but who knows if that's the pain pills or if the problem is starting to dissipate. I just need to be better by Friday, when we leave at 7:00 am to fly out to San Francisco. Mama's got a lot of walking plans on Friday, Saturday and Sunday and let me tell you, picking up the kiddo and walking around don't sound too appealing to me right now! So, please pray to the back healing gods that I start to feel better soon! I would appreciate any positive back healing vibes sent my way!
This "transformation" was pretty easy to do since I don't need a conventional darkroom. As I use 19th-century printing processes for my images, light is not only okay, it's necessary. The processes use strong sunlight to develop the image--or in my case, a high-intensity UV-light source. As a result, bulb light and stray daylight aren't issues at all. That's not to say you can't turn an everyday bathroom into a conventional darkroom--I've done it successfully. But in the end, I find contemporary silver gelatin papers (i.e., conventional black-and-white print) rather flat; the past decade has seen a rapid decrease in quality from producers, who've found decreasing the silver in paper secures the highest profit. This is one of the reasons I hand-coated fine-arts paper with sensitizing chemicals I've mixed myself. It's the best way to assure the quality and look I want.
I will stamp a sentiment inside later, I am waiting on some sentiment stamp sets that I ordered.
What brought me to Bow yesterday were allegations of widespread postal voting fraud. Both the local Conservative and Respect parties in Tower Hamlets have been looking through the new electoral rolls for properties that have an alarmingly high number of adults registered to one address. The area has a large Bengali population and this type of fraud is unfortunately all too common. In some instances there have been as many as 20 Bengali names supposedly living in two or three-bedroom flats. When journalists have previously called, all too often there are far fewer living there. In some instances, no Bengalis at all.
Instead of dropping to the box behind me that I’d been using to step into the bands, I dropped to the floor with one foot still in the bands. I lost my balance, tumbled over my box, thankfully my foot sprung free from the bands. After a very graceless one-footed dance, I wound up flat on my back on the gym floor. A couple of folks called out, and Jack came by, to check on me. I assured them all I wasn’t hurt, but really PISSED because I still had to get back up in those bands for a final rep! Yeesh! The indignity of it all. Even in the moment, it was pretty comical. After a moment to compose myself, I got back in the bands and knocked out the 100th rep in the 13th set.
Mimi quickly ran out of the parlour room and down the hallway towards the armament display. She grabbed the Sword of Punarbrula from its display case and turned to face her jelly like husband as he rolled glisteningly across the floor after her.
So I took on a personal trainer today.
I didn't finish reading it last week, either, though, so it seems like I would have just said, "No, thanks," when The EGE asked if I wanted one. Everyone once in a while, though, I get some fabulous idea from something I read in it. Plus it's kind of an antidote to the Midland Reporter-Telegram, which just assumes that everyone in Midland is exactly alike in everything they do and think politically and culturally and socially and religiously. And I'm going to quit right there before I begin to rant because I've got a ton of stuff to do today including an interview about which I'm really excited--someone I've talked to in person before and who is just really fascinating to me--I love what he does and can't wait to find out more.
In August, the Georgian navy seized a Turkish tanker carrying fuel to Abkhazia, Georgia's former province whose declaration of independence a year ago is recognized by Russia but not the West.
He lives my mansion to prepare.
juvenile feathers, in about two weeks!
-they fight into the back and into locker rooms.
AT WILL by Leanna Renee Hieber
Guavas, pineapples and watermelons are some of the few fruits that are at their best and ripest in summer. And in my grandmother's huge kitchen garden, there were all these fruits blooming away to glory during the summer. I particularly loved Guavas. There used to be three or four of these Gauva trees. Each one bore hundreds of fruits. I remember one particular type of Guava used to be red inside and green outside.
10 gm of agar-agar (jelly) powder, choose plain colour
In the meantime, if your child is a bully or you are a bully, take a long look at the statistics above and decide what direction you want to take in your life. It is a decision that could affect the rest of it.
She looked adorable in her uniform, so grown up and I felt so proud of her.
We hope you enjoy your trip, and we thank you for flying Time Continuum Airways: the airline that takes you any where--and any time--you want to go.
work if your hope doesn’t translate to faith. True faith transcends the realms
While some of this land can be considered "national treasures"... unique, scenic, pristine, fragile... a lot of it is generally nondescript. And some of it is valuable for what lies below the surface.
I adjust the recipe according to however many avocados I use. This was a big hit at Christmas. AND, since I made a large batch I did use a mixer.
I remember my first encounter with someone who had been drinking and become drunk. I was four years old on a train with my mom and sister headed to a different state to visit family. I was coloring with the girl in the seat beside me, and this guy approached us and wanted to help us color. It was a little weird because he was quite persistent. Had that been the only encounter, I do not know that I would have remembered it. But hours later, this man caused a ruckus and was confronted by a woman who worked on the train. He threatened her. I was only a few rows away from where this was all going on. I remember being very scared of what was going on. Nothing major came of the situation; I think he eventually calmed down. But to this day, drunk people make me very nervous because that encounter is so etched in my mind. Last night, I realized something, whether you are drunk with alcohol, or you are “drunk” with the Spirit of God, anyone who encounters you will not forget that encounter. If you are filled with the Spirit, you might be witnessing to someone and despite the working of the Holy Spirit, they reject Christ at that time, but I guarantee you, they will not forget your attempt. You may be the first person that they have met who has actually been “different” because of their faith; maybe you are just one of many, but no matter what a person filled with the Spirit of God is unforgettable.
What do you think? Did you watch 7 Days of Sex? Do you plan to catch at least one episode – why or why not? Do you agree with any of the above assessments about how men and women feel about sex? I’d love to hear from you!
That drink was for me.
Last Monday: Completely just does not exist to me. I got on the plane Friday evening and arrived here on Monday evening, with about a 6 hour layover in Frankfurt because we missed the plane. So Monday night consisted of meeting my host family, unpacking, and going to bed at 9pm.
I have received a sample in exchange for this review. All opinions in this review are that of me or my family and are 100% honest! I was not compensated in any way for this review nor am I obligated to give a positive review!
Mark Ronson is a sought-after turntablist who's worked with such diverse artists as Macy Gray, Jay-Z, and comedian Jimmy Fallon. The stepson of guitarist Mick Jones of Foreigner, Ronson spent the first eight years of his life growing up in England. Having played guitar and drums from an early age, it wasn't until moving to New York City with his mother that Ronson discovered DJ culture. At age 16, already a fan of such popular hip-hop artists as Run-D.M.C. and the Beastie Boys, Ronson began listening to the various hip-hop mixtapes released every few months by DJs. Inspired, Ronson confiscated his father's record collection and began trying his hand at mixing.
He added: “There are clearly areas of the country where it can be accommodated and they really need to be properly researched so it can be done with less impact on what is a thriving community.”
Clive Barker – Haeckel’s Tale
Can you give me some examples of what would be high quality beers that should be served at a high quality restaurant?
Puzzled John asks, "What did I have?"
According to the executive summary of the report, “The full report reveals a pattern of historical revisionism, omissions and bias in the presentation of all aspects devoted to Islam in these textbooks. These aspects include its theology and doctrines, its role as a world religion, its ongoing struggle with Western tradition and its intrinsic anti-Semitism.”
A check of online reviews found this to be a wine with mostly positive and VERY positive reviews. One site indicated that the 2007 vintage Merlot was in the Top-10 Merlots of the year for that particular year.
However, I cannot entirely say this with a straight face. There is Spiderman, Solitude B09/10.
A very good offering, I highly recommend it.
and all the while knowing that it should be a crime
As I have pointed out in previous posts, I seem to have a good way of coming across all wrong. I recently had yet another experience in which my intentions were completely misinterpreted. I must preface this story by telling another story that sets the tone for this one.
The transfer of 750,000 jobs from the public to the private sector accounted for 71 per cent of the apparent increase in private sector jobs between 1979 and 1997. Under Labour, increased spending on health and education accounted for 37 per cent of job growth (61 per cent in the West Midlands, 43 per cent in Wales and 46 per cent in Scotland). Privatisation and outsourcing led to an expansion of state funding for private employers, as in nursery education and services for the elderly – 1.7 million jobs.
You were born on Tuesday, September 13th, 2011. I went to work that morning to teach 5th grade. The morning was a little rough as my big belly made it very difficult to sleep. It was very hard for me to get out of bed but I did and I made it to work. I did feel a little strange, but just thought it was due to the fact that I was 35 weeks pregnant with twins, chasing around your big brother and teaching 5th grade. So I went on with the day. I taught my first two classes all the while just feeling a little "weird". During my third hour class I left my kids with an assignment and headed to the office to have my blood pressure checked. I could not shake the feeling that something was up. My blood pressure checked out fine, but I was just not convinced. So I called my doctor and he told me to come in. I was supposed to have my 35 week checkup that day after school, but instead I got a sub and took a half day and went in at 11:30.
Austin played some pretty NOT cheap games
Today we have bigger houses but smaller families.
Here’s the thing: the world thrives, we thrive, when we make connections and share in our talents and visions. There is not, and there never will be (thank goodness!) only one of the best of everything: the best musician, the best writer, the best designer. Someone else excelling in a field that you work in doesn’t mean you should stop doing your work, or that it’s any less valid.
Summary Blurb (GR):
I can’t think of any price that being childfree comes with. The only price I can think of comes with the territory of having children. With the sticker price on a child being almost a quarter of a million US equivalent, all the countless hours you’re going to have to sacrifice, giving up your sick time to take care of the kid instead of using it for yourself, and even giving up many of your hobbies (or at the very minimum, reducing the amount of time you spend on them), having a kid comes with a HUGE price.
Oh my! Has it been an entire week since I last posted?? That's no good! I need to be more active in the blogging world! No worries though, I've got a few upcoming posts up my sleeve. :0)
For this first card I made my own sentiment by selectively inking parts of one of the stamps from the kit. I lined it up using an acrylic block with grids and used the bottom of the panel as my guide. The original sentiment said "I miss seeing you." but as you can see I edited out the seeing part for my card. The papers are all from October Afternoon---I love the grey and blue tones of that collection. I flipped the inspiration sketch for this card.
People that choose to smoke actually provide a cost savings to society because if you believe the statistics, (and what Anti-smoker doesn’t love statistics down to the parts per billion?) smokers die an average of 10 years sooner than non-smokers and save society money on Social Security, Medicaid, Medicare, and nearly every other costly end of life expense incurred.
“We need to be called out of ourselves because, in truth, we are incomplete. God made us to find our fulfillment in him—the Totally Other. Marriage shows us that we are not all there is; it calls us to give way to another, but also to find joy, happiness, and even ecstasy in another.”
Your excuses will never suffice.
One of Aulani's major focuses is on traditional Hawaiian art and culture, which inspires the entire hotel. Some of the touches are whimsical, like the Menehune hidden throughout the resort area. Like this little guy at left, hiding in plain site near the ceiling in one of the elevators.
Please swing low, sweet chariot.
Even though the walls are a deep navy, the shiny tin and multiple mirrors keep it from feeling like a cave. It does have a dramatic moody feel, and the dark walls are a relief on the eyes when coming inside from a sunny afternoon by the pool.
Hadar
I'm that mom. And I'm proud and happy to be.
The sunshine hurts my eyes, but my skin is soaking up the vitamins. The important things and people in my life are more precious. The less important and downright unnecessary are gradually removing themselves from my space. I can move now (I joined Curves with a friend to add motion to my weeks), where all I did for months was sit and stew in my misery. I can breathe. There is still a weight on my shoulders, but it gets easier to lift every day.
I love that he's stronger than me and knows more about certain things than I do. I love that he wraps his arms around me and makes me feel secure. I love that he leads me through a crowd while holding my hand. I love that he holds doors open for me after almost 19 years together. I love that he's my "covering" and when we're apart I don't quite feel complete. I love the way he respects me and how he thinks I'm beautiful even when I don't have my hair fixed or make up on.
Mr. Wesley cautioned a preacher going to Ireland against snuff, unless by order of a physician, declaring that no people were in such blind bondage to the silly, nasty, dirty custom as were the Irish. It is stated so far did Irishmen carry their love of snuffing, that it was customary, when a wake was on, to put a plate full of snuff upon the dead man's, or woman's stomach, from which each guest was expected to take a pinch upon being introduced to the corpse.
it is the work of a few of us that meet at Contemporary Craft group at
But she does have one skill: while wearing shapewear and with her reading glasses perched on her nose, she can out-research the best of them, especially when her caffeine levels are high.
There was chanting, yet it was recorded
Few garments wed style and function as tightly as a cycling cap. The germ of the idea for these caps was probably formed over a hundred years ago, as a cyclist crested one of the French alps, heading east early in the AM. Wanting to keep the sun out of her eyes, but not wanting to obscure her field of vision unnecessarily, she would have rushed home to sew a cap with a curt brim. It blocks the sun, but it doesn't stop the world from seeing your beautiful face. Another bonus is that the hat prevents painful pate sunburns for balding individuals.
Eleven years ago, on April 14, my baby sister was born- and I was stoked. I loved Trey and Jack SO much but I felt bad making them dress up all the time and was excited to have a little sister who would appreciate the costumes (sorry for the girly games, Trey and Jack!). Molly is the best sister I could have ever asked for and I’m so blessed that she is in my life; the ten year age difference has absolutely no effect on us, as we still hang out all the time. Luckily, I appreciate musical sensations such as High School Musical (I’m serious, I was in a HSM play) and she shares my love of Taylor Swift, so we rock out in the car regularly. We also share a love of Sweet Frog, having dance parties, the beach and taking pictures. She’s my mini-me.
If she can do it, play this well on a piano, what does it mean for Kimberly Cross? Could I actually master the piano, and if so, are there other instruments besides that blessed trumpet I can play and play well? The end goal is not to land a spot on a worship team or make music as an artist. The true desire is to 1. worship Jesus through an instrument and 2. use them as teaching tools in my classroom. Multiplication tables through song = memorization gold. My third graders would love it if this musical element was brought into the classroom.
Paris: Oh. You mean like how you feel after having sex?
I have always seen Daz as a kind of mentor, and he certainly knows more about buying media than anyone I know.
2. Arriving late for anything.
newness:
Below: Panini my female kitty spends countless hours in this window, desperately wishing to be an outdoor kitty.. Here's what I know she was thinking because I saw it leap from the shrub to the roof .. " Was that a squirrel ? " Wow that was Amazzzzing!
“Early day. What you yelling at Ma for?”
As a friend, I love my girlies and those whom I hang out with.
“Yay, it’s time to stretch!”
disciplined
Time and date: 1.00pm, 31/07/2011
by Edgar Allan Poe
A bientôt!
I changed tracks!
Hutchings, 38, started riding to work for health reasons. Bored by gyms, but determined to fit exercise into his daily routine, he bought a Pashley adult tricycle in 2011. He opted for the three-wheeler for better balance and stability, but he’s found the bike offers something else — interaction with his surroundings. A trike isn’t something you see everyday, so it gets lot of looks, which often leads to conversations with strangers. He takes his camera with him every morning. He sees parts of the city he’d never noticed before. And though his morning ride only lasts 20 minutes, he’s found it makes him more laid-back all day.
Last night we went to wing night at a friend’s house, and made these fig appetizers out of some of the figs we had still frozen. Because I make tend to food the “Tom Sawyer” way, I also made my own French bread, but as that takes about 2 hours one day and 5 hours the next, well I realize not everyone has that kind of time. By all means, buy the bread, but definitely try this appetizer!
This beer pours an amber hue with three fingers worth of head on it. It left great lacing on my pint glass. The nose is pretty potent on this beer with the the hop cone being the sole focus. There is plenty of citrus fruit, grapefruit peel, earthiness, and sticky pine as well. I am not getting much in the nose in the way of malt though. My first sips of this beer is a fairly intense rush of bitterness followed by a slight bit of syrupy sweetness as well. The hop bitterness is hard to pin down and is all over the place. I get quite a bit of oily hops, citrus fruit, tobacco, pink grapefruit, and lots of sweet caramel trying to balance the flavors out. This beer is just all over the place, and after about eight ounces really became too much for me. I couldn't really pin down any of the flavors and the malt sweetness was completely separate from the over the top hop bitterness. The mouthfeel was slick and oily that was medium bodied with the alcohol quite present. The drinkability is only good for me for about six ounces of this beer, and after that fell off quite quickly.
"You're angry
I may still post about politics on occasion, but generally I’m going to keep doing what I’ve been doing.
(Guardian, April 27, 2005)
and as always you must live well to be well…to your personal wellness
a CO alarm should be installed outside of each separate sleeping area in the immediate vicinity of the bedroom(s) in dwelling units and on every level including basements within which fuel-fired appliances are installed and in dwelling units that have attached garages.
Also, that I have this crazy itch at the back of my neck right now?
I'm away at my Mums for a couple of days, so I apologise if I haven't been around much, what with work and getting ready for the start of our summer season there isn't enough hours in the day!
I found these and emailed Al the link asking her opinion, 'gorgeous' she said, so I ordered them and went to bed - by this time it was almost midnight & we'd been 'shopping' for maybe 2 hours...and 2 days later the boots turned up. Of course they came when Si was here, rather than on a different continent, so I was unable to whisk the evidence (shopping bag/boxes/receipt) away so that the item could emerge weeks later from the bowels of my wardrobe to be worn, and then when asked 'is that new?' I could honestly respond 'no'***. Simon was distracted by the box the boots came in,
Dr. Róbert Péter, Senior Assistant Professor, University of Szeged
And he looked so adorable in his bright green swim nappy covered in sharks and fishes and other sea creatures. Lots of people in the pool came over to ask questions about him; about how old he is and his name, the usual. He attracts a lot of attention. I’m so proud of my gorgeous little bundle of cuteness.
As time floats in a river with me
Are there any other questions on her bookshelves that I left out? Feel free to ask, and I'll update the list above with answers!
Thereafter, Phoenix and Tiger continue to mow down henchmen and chase Snake as he attempts to peddle the laptop. Their pursuit leads them back to Black Dragon as they square off against Snake, more cronies and Black Dragon in hopes of safeguarding VINSTAT-1 and saving Phoenix's daughter.
The U.S. Department of Justice sought their extradition from Canada to the United States. A marathon court battle ensued, with the brothers finally surrendering to U.S. custody in October 2010.
04 Love Will Tear Us Apart (Live)
Three pieces of advice to a monsoon gardener: stay outdoors in spite of the heat, check the weather forecast yourself and grow a rattan in your garden. This is why:
148 7. “What Gerald Ford Should Be Saying.” Chicago Tribune, October 20, 1976, sec. 3, p. 4.
Vincent Wollin, murdered on his sixty-ninth birthday.
Back to dating, yes the strong independent type, a few men found that attractive on the first couple of dates that all seemed tickety boo until they realised that it was normal and I wasn’t playing a dating game (silly me) I was under the impression I was to be myself.
This nation
Although God is the Creator of us all, there are two conditions you and I must meet before we can be called God’s children. One is that we must receive Jesus, or open the door of our hearts and invite Him to come in. The other is that we must believe in His Name.
- Single
Change also came to my own person as I went on to lose 113 lbs. (so far). Those size 24 pants are now replaced by size 10 clothes and I no longer have to shop in plus-size stores. As my eating changed, my health improved and one by one, I got off of every single medication. My blood pressure is now normal (it was once 220/110) and my blood test results no longer show someone who is at risk of cardiovascular disease or stroke. Because I eat a healthy, balanced diet, I get all the vitamins and nutrients my body needs.
I don't have a very visual imagination. This is a problem when trying to decide what colour to paint your kitchen (yellow, like Anne Sexton) and also when trying to imagine what a medieval peasant girl's house looks like.
Since this is a part of my larger India Reading Project involving books and the reading people, I’ll be counting on the link-back for continued and further participation of new readers.
Do you remember NY in 1986? Pre Juliani... This is what NY was like then.... Fucking DIRTY, SCUMMY, AND DANGEROUS!
2. Release
If you can answer yes to all of these your team is rolling along well and is open to any and all input. Great! Unfortunately most teams aren’t operating in this well. There are several reasons this may be the case.
It is often better to contour the face before you apply eye make up as you will be inclined to be less dramatic with the eyes.
Almost two years after working on season 1 of Transformers, Obari returned in the Fall of 1986 to work on one of the final episodes, episode 91 titled Call of the Primitives. Not much is known about the staff details however this episode is known for it’s high quality and it is known that Obari was the Animation Director, this episode also used animation models which were unlike the ones used in the rest of the show.
And those are my picks!
-Very expensive
Since my unexpected post on Tuesday I have been tagged again, this time by the very lovely, interesting and highly readable blogger The Girl at Living with a Boy. Honestly a blog well worth the visit, such a unique talent for writing darn good stuff! Anyway I have to list 10 things which make me happy, so (some are the same as my last list) here goes!:
I really enjoyed this beer, and I am going to assume this is a good example of the style. I am going to search out more old ales to get more familiar with the style. I can easily see having old ales around this Winter. This is yet another great beer from Founders.
RADNET readers, please consider the following:
Please bear with me as I tread through these new (and exciting!) waters. And remember, the extra dough (Even if it is paltry, I mean, I'm not quitting my day job here!) only means more projects and makeovers I can show here! Win-Win, right?!
HUNTSVILLE, Texas — The outcome of legal wrangling about condemned killer Steven Staley’s mental health is likely to determine if the former laborer is put to death this week in Texas for a slaying almost a quarter-century ago in Fort Worth.
I know…sign me up for that Mother of the Year award right away! ;)
I made my way out of the living room and over to the staircase, mindful of everything around me.
It has been reported to me that the overwhelming majority (actually I have been told 80%) of the students did drink alcohol on the London trip this year. One source reports the students had no curfew (staying out until 4a.m. on one occasion), that the chaperones not only knew the students were consuming alcohol but that one chaperone actually offered a student alcohol in front of other students, that a chaperone gave permission in front of other students for a small group of students to order wine at dinner, and that one student became so drunk, the student had to be cared for by a chaperone the day following a binge that induced vomiting. The source also says that given the above information, the students actually thought it was ok with the chaperones if "legal drinking" did take place on the trip which is why so many chose to consume.
The report will also have comments as to how my staff and I have managed the church’s finances during the year. In other words, the audit team will review and comment on my role as the STEWARD of the finances and assets of the church.
Ask Pixie Vacations about packages in other resort categories and for other lengths of stay.
Ah, it feels
The elephant had been seven stories high and over 100 feet long. The first floor had a restaurant and saloon, while the upper floors were used as a hotel. On the top was a howdah (a saddle used to ride an elephant), which was used as an observation deck. There was a cigar store in one of its legs and a “diorama” for panoramic views in the other.
This is what happened: The first speaker on the panel was Stephanie Kitchen a library user, new to campaigning but having done her homework, who said that the library budget represented less than 2% of the Council's budget. Then Steve Squibbs, a UNISON steward from Hampshire libraries and a Library Assistant himself, told us about the situation there, where, for example 9 out of 11 libraries on the Isle if Wight were up for closure.
There are also several other posts going up throughout the month. Subjects include tackling TBR piles, making time to read and more.
Yes! I am very much alive and kicking. Actually I was really sick this week and that’s the reason for my online disappearance. Now everyone asks me what the hell I do all day, because they knew the old me who was happy to sit all day in front of the computer and complain about stuff. I do still complain about stuff everyday, but I am changed quite a lot. Now let me offer you a small preview of my work. What do I do and really enjoy doing is now located in eComplex Shrine, in Romania. It’s in a small village that me and a few friends like to call it TartaCity, the real name is Tartasesti and it’s located in Dambovita County, very close to Bucharest.
So, here is what the room looked like before:
Additionally, The Atlantic questions whether subjects used in experimental screening will be able to accurately mimic the cues that real terrorist would have in the field. However, with the wealth of surveillance that we have gathered of terrorists planning or conducting attacks, especially in the last decade in the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan, as well as with reams of scientific study of the mind and body, we should be able to distinguish the difference between someone about to commit mass murder from someone simply visiting their grandmother in Miami.
I believe one of Jonah's birthday parties will involve small pots, small plants, dinosaurs, pirates, and kid creativity! Wouldn't that be a fun party activity??
Weird Dreams: Nope
This is any “vain imagination which sets itself against the knowledge of Jesus Christ.” I’ve been dealing with this on a daily basis. Well, every believer should be. It’s a part of our walk. It seems I’m in the front line of the battle ground.
Mike Farris @ 3rd & Lindsley – come get your SOUL on!
I wouldn’t say this is the most attractive photo ever (nor would I generally condone his apparent attitudes towards women), but he does get a vote of support from me for wearing a thong … especially in public. Fight the good fight, Brother!
My calves are so tight and the muscles around my knees keep cramping and sending spasms down my legs. I don't think its a major injury because it's gradually getting better and I'm pretty sure it's got to do with me not feeding my body properly on Saturday morning. I made up for it over the weekend and had possibly too many carbs by last night. In fact I know I did because I had indigestion and it did not make a good sleep. At least I've finished the left over pasta salad now!
No Wilde Fae remained standing. Bodies lay scattered across the cavern floor, though not nearly as many as had filled it before. Those that had not fallen to the cats must have fled. Jillian turned and saw the prince's remains behind her.
I went for a massage yesterday.
Big bang theory
So the story ended with Katie giving her CD player to the dinosaurs to keep, so they can enjoy a bop whenever the mood grabs them. Katie then returned to the museum and Grandma (who may well have had something to say about the missing CD player!)
Hmmm…see any comparisons between the two that could be problematic?
Goodman felt that NFL player Driver performed better than the telenovela star William Levy. Goodman’s top score so far this season has been a nine and last night he gave nines to Driver, Katherine Jenkins (with Mark Ballas) and Jaleel White (with Kym Johnson).
Dropshadow them slightly.
08 Not Mobile
Now, let’s talk physics because we now can reveal some things, beautiful things, that are starting to occur in science and are starting to be seen and partially understood. What you have before you, the gentleman sitting on the floor, is Yawee. I know him well.
A chronically ill Canadian man who has endured torture at the hands of the Western-backed Bahraini regime is facing a five-year jail sentence that could put his life at risk.
As far as I'm concerned, I'd probably subscribe to the attitude of:
living for amazing views
3 afraid
It promises to be quite a night!
Just wonderful
It helps in keeping the mouth and gums free from any diseases like ulcers and bleeding bums.
Last – but definitely not the least – is DO CHI SAN (Choi Woo Shik). He is dressed as a gisaeng and pees at a man’s urinal. OMG! Hilarious! He was originally raised as a palace attendant but was kicked out for being too close to the court ladies. He’s currently part of a top gisaeng house which gives him access to information about the palace and high ranking officials. In stealth mode, he gets access to highly confidential information.
R2R: Is there anything else you’d like to add?
In an obvious attempt to inflict a symmetrical Climategate-style scandal on the skeptic community, someone representing himself as a Heartland Institute insider “leaked” internal documents for Heartland’s most recent board of directors meeting to a fringe environmental blog, along with a photocopy of a supposed Heartland “strategy memo” outlining a plan to disseminate a public school curriculum aimed at “dissuading teachers from teaching science.”
“In light of Secretary Chu admitting this was a fact, it is clear that the Administration knew - or should have known - that there was no chance of ever recovering the $170 million* they put at risk by subordinating the loan. DOE was fully aware that the Solyndra business model could not compete with the Chinese. Secretary Chu, DOE, and President Obama took a risky gamble when they lent $535 million to Solyndra. But, when they agreed to the subordination of $75 million** they lit a match to America money because the chance of full recovery was zero percent. Unfortunately, the American taxpayers are left holding the ashes.”
Funny side note, my cat Remy has now learned how to operate the automatic can opener. He will run it for a second then wait for the magic tuna can to appear. As if by sheer will and whirring noises the blessed food will arrive open and ready to be consumed.
The first step in credit repair is to close all but one of your credit accounts as soon as possible. You will want to either transfer your balances onto the one remaining card or set up payment arrangements, but close the account to new charges. This allows you to pay off one credit card bill rather than many smaller ones.
The cycle of the year is reaching a summit in April in my view.
Gathering beneath the steeple,
Avery Brewing Company Black Tot
Referred to the style, a traditional party dress with a crinoline is a wonderful choice for a wedding of almost any level of formality. And the ideal length for that little gown is below the knee or tea length. Never choose the floor length as it looks like a miniature bride and is really creepy rather than cute! Also there are no dresses for little girl that are too tight or even remotely sexy. The little girls at wedding, in particular, are usually on the side of being more conservative and traditional.
Tee-Jay
Myth: the gap between rich and poor is growing in America.
On the other hand, there is a word for people who refuse to take reasonable precautions, or even negotiate in good faith the cheapest and most efficient just-in-case precautions, demanding instead (at the behest of a couple of coal-billionaire brothers) that climate theory be absolutely proved in all levels, in all ways, before we take prudent, moderate measures to protect ourselves.
Sage is enjoying kindergarten the first couple of weeks she would come home and say my I had the best day ever. I would say thats what you said yesterday. No mom today was is her response. Now she isn't as excited to jump out of bed and hurry and get dressed. She is not liking the early morning thing. We do carpool and sometimes I will be at the school about the time her class gets out and surprise her to pick her up. Well the surprise is on me she would rather ride carpool then with her mom. A little tear but that's ok. I signed her up for tumbling again and I think she loves it. This is her second session. It helps her get out her energy lol. Oh yeah she also got her ears ears pierced as she would say. She was so excited and nervous, but she took it like a real tough girl and didn't even cry. She is so proud of them and loves showing them off.
It took tremendous courage for principals to sign the petition. Sadly, they didn’t even get the support of the teachers’ unions of New York State. Indeed, NYSUT told its members not to sign. I can’t explain why. It made no sense to me. Why would teachers want to be judged by the arbitrary rise or fall of test scores.
"Yeah, sure Doc, fatty liver, yada yada, heard that one before." But it is too vague and generalised a threat. The empirical cause-effect link, while undeniably there, is just not specific enough.
Q060) Please tell us about a current drama that you like!
So the other day I asked for suggestions for inspection stops in the Eastern Kingdoms. The suggestions pretty much clustered – a lot of recommendations for the northern regions like Hillsbrad, Tirisfal, and the Plaguelands, and then some others for our southern outposts in the Blasted Lands and the Swamp of Sorrows. For the time being I’m going to table the northern settlements. For one thing, hitting all the outposts will definitely take more time than I can spare in one chunk, and also, more importantly, after this past week’s mailbag, I have some business I need to go check on in Outland, so I figure it would just make more sense to deal with the southern outposts on my way to and from the Dark Portal.
I find myself in a similar position as I grow in age and wisdom (well, definitely the former; the latter is arguable) before man and God. I want desperately to share the trust in Christ's promise so certain in the heart and mind of St. Paul. I want so desperately to run a good race, be self-possessed, put up with hardship, perform the work of an evangelist and fulfill my ministry (apostolate, more appropriately in my case); but in the words of Tevye in "Fiddler on the Roof", "Would it spoil some vast eternal plan"…just to get a glimpse, ever so brief, of the finish line?
1- Sony SAL-55200-2 55-200mm f/4-5.6 DT AF Zoom Lens
Too many of us
“Fuck that, John... I'll pay the extra myself just to lose him!”
The best halo-halo for me is Icebergs halo-halo. I can't get enough of it. It is literally filled with 12 tasty ingredients with 2 scoops of ice cream on top, but I think it's their macapuno balls that made their halo-halo so flavorful. It is served with separate evaporated milk and sugar so you can adjust its taste to your desired creaminess and sweetness. You may think that P118 is too expensive for a glass of halo-halo. But Icebergs halo-halo is served in a large bowl instead of the usual tall glass. Once you tasted it, you'll say that P118 is cheap for its delicious taste.
Wow! What a novel idea. A life application for what my Mom regularly reminds me of, “JoDee, you need to live like an alcoholic, ‘One day at a time.’”
B ecause of trial or pain
I have a friend who is fond of saying, “You know what that feeling of impending doom is? It’s impending doom, mother-f*****!” While this friend is obviously equally fond of colorful language, the irony in his statement is not lost, at least for me. When one is faced with dread, one would expect an optimist to discount it as only a feeling; things are not as bad as
So a few weeks ago my co-creator went on a job interview. He wasn’t actively looking, but during the course of the process, he kind of got excited about the possibility of the new job. It would be doing things he had done before, but with new challenges. It would also be a chance to work with someone who he had worked with before, who he respects and enjoys working with. The other day, he started to text me while at work asking of he should call the hiring manager to see if they had made their choice. This was not the first of the texts that G had sent me on this topic. My response was to ask him what was on his nose.
1 1/4 cups confectioners’
At least 66 of the dead were recruits, but there were also civilian casualties, officials say. A number of vehicles were destroyed in the blast.
If the league were really serious about preventing head injuries and escalating levels of violence; if they wanted to send a message to all the players that they are watching and willing to act, they would have suspended Shea Weber for his head smashing of Henrik Zetterberg. Even one game to Weber would have been far more of a message to the players than what Torres got.
6. From Fortress Monroe to the Chesapeake Bay Bridge-Tunnel, up Rt. 13 to Rt. 175 and out to Chincoteague. The Bay Bridge-Tunnel is worth every dollar I've ever paid to cross it. The technological wonder, the isolation in fog, the excitement of seeing the battleship Iowa curving about at high speed in the bay and the quiet power of a nuclear attack sub slipping out on the surface one foggy afternoon. Eastern Shore is a world apart, and Chincoteague even more so.
But this list doesn’t seem to be complete. For example, I ordered 4 toys from Amazon last week. All these toys were fulfilled and shipped by Amazon. All 4 toys would fit into a 26x13x13 box. But Amazon has sent these toys in 3 packages, although they were sent from the same fulfillment center and all of them were shipped the same day.
It will do no good to an applicant who claims to be a “jack of all trades but a master of none.” Six out of 10 applicants are hired because of their expertise on a certain field. This only means that employers are more concerned with people who have already mastered their career and have established continuous career growth.
When I last posted I was in KY helping my mom who had a total knee replacement surgery. I enjoyed my time with Mom (though not the reason for it!), and I am grateful that my employers support and encourage family care. My dear hubby is also very supportive and I wouldn't have been able to go if he wasn't at home holding down the fort, so to speak, taking care of the houndies, cats, chickens, plants, working, cooking, grocery shopping...you get the picture!
We’ve found that the 30-min ‘Lunch and Learn’ refreshers, combined with the more in-depth 45-min ‘Applications’ webinars have worked really well. Running them over the lunchtime period means that participants can combine their lunch break with a bit of informal learning.
His new goal, now that he's 5:
You get to see the seals (Common Seal) on the way, last time we saw a Sea eagle & you get great banter from the Captain. We've always done the trip where you get dropped off for 1 1/2 hrs, run round a bit, eat a quick picnic & then hop back on the boat for a delicious hot chocolate & a bumpy (because the wind's picked up!) ride back to the pier.
Quite a while ago, while shopping at Tar-jay with a friend, I came across these place mats on clearance. Anyone can lay out 6 place mats. How can I change them?
Well, I don’t think they’ll be happy if I put their actual name online, on my blog. They’ll probably kill me. Especially my EXTRME Jpop friend. She get annoyed or angry at the SLIGHTEST things. Like if you write a romanji wrong … or pronounce something wrong. Ahh.. It’s hard being her friend. Jk. we’ve been friends for .. three to four years.. I’ve gotten used to it.
In the context of a gallery, Roth’s evidence does not add up; seemingly, the gallery walls themselves prohibit the possibility that this tunnel could indeed exist; Art, of course, is just the mirror of life. However, if one would imagine the same items tagged and bagged in a court room, a jury perhaps would be convinced. Which leads the viewer to consider how myths are constructed, and whether or not any of these myths, could possibility have a ground in the real world.
They continued day-night torture to get me to confess to a non-existent part in the escape. This went on for at least 3 days. On my knees…fan belting…cut open my scrotum with fan belt stroke. Opened up both knee holes again. My fanny looked like hamburger…I could not lie on my back.
Of course though, had this been Middlest's one true love?
I received this text message at 12:18AM last night. I was just about to turn off my iphone after reading the news and call it a night. Something made me hang on and I am so glad that I did. The text message was from my daughter and she had just experienced the earthquake that struck in Christchurch, New Zealand. I tried to call from every phone in the house and could not get thru to her.
Thank God for the concept, idea, and reality of friendship.
Cover: Very appropriate although I wish we could see more of the mask. I still have trouble imagining exactly how it looks.
Sister Act
It is raining on the hill today. Such a gentle rain. Take care and thanks for stopping by for tea.
At a certain point, I’ve just concluded that– for me personally, it is important for me to go ahead and affirm that– I think same-sex couples should be able to get married. Now– I have to tell you that part of my hesitation on this has also been I didn’t want to nationalize the issue. There’s a tendency when I weigh in to think suddenly it becomes political and it becomes polarized.
“I see in the near future a crisis approaching that unnerves me and causes me to tremble for the safety of my country. As a result of the war, corporations have been enthroned and an era of corruption in high places will follow, and the money power of the country will endeavor to prolong its reign by working upon the prejudices of the people until all wealth is aggregated in a few hands, and the Republic is destroyed. I feel at this moment more anxiety for the safety of my country than ever before, even in the midst of war.” –Abraham Lincoln – In a letter written to William Elkin
August 14, 2010 — Cindy Anthony on the “Today” Show calls Casey a victim, and claims she’s not involved with what happened to Caylee’s remains.
Kneel in front of the water cooler and drink directly from the nozzle.
…so, here it goes…
You slowly shook your head, ‘I’m going, William. I can’t have you wasting away at my bedside while machines keep me alive.’
25. “Cheerleader” by St. Vincent
"Maybe we can just stay here a little while," I said. "Get our batteries charged."
But nowhere found the Day of Sowing:
But here it is, introduced by Frank Gaffney, the president of CSP:
Beyond the Top 1000 (boys: 5, girls: 9)
"The Ingredients"
Eh, I guess I'd warmed pretty significantly to Clinton right before his first term, but I still thought he was too centrist for me to truly love. By the end of his first term, I was CERTAIN of that, and pulled the lever as a dutiful Democrat, but with no real enthusiasm. I didn't love Al Gore until his damned concession speech, when I saw the glimmer of the great man within, and I wept tears of pure anger that night; anger AT HIM, for not revealing it to us sooner.
let your soul
She is an amazing young woman and tells her story wonderfully.
to make your
Said Williams:
Hope to see you there!! Enjoy local company and support us!
"Who am I kidding? I can't sew."
Won't you head on over there and read my post? And please leave me a comment letting me know you stopped by.
You can then say "Well we go to the library, shopping, visit an elderly peoples home once a week, dancing, Basket Ball, Swimming, Scouts, visiting with grandparents and family every week, running their home ed group with other home ed children, going to camps, helping out with our family meal planning and budget, they also play in the local music band and take bread to local families every few weeks. Any of that Socialisation?"
At home, Trevor's bimbo is concerned when he locks himself into the bathroom. She eventually goes into the kitchen, and Trevor remembers Helen in happier times. Trevor starts to cry in front of the bathroom mirror, and thnere's a sudden power outage...but only in that room.
Between the hospital visits and the sleepless nights after, I've been doing a lot of reading lately. I've just finished "Something Borrowed" and "One Day." Do you see the pattern? Yup, I like reading books that they turn into movies.
Luiz insisted on showing me the downstairs area (down the mysterious spiral staircase!!) which they open for business lunches or busier days. It is smartly simplistic with photographs of the favourite Columbian and Brazilian cuisine reminding the team of their homes. Luiz told me that he had come to England ten years ago to find a better life and loved running the cafe with his friends and family.
But don't just take my word for it, I have proof.
The Sun – TWO of the biggest names in touring car racing, Audi and Toyota, will return to the UK's premier series next year. A pair of Audi A4s will be entered in the British Touring Car Championship by new team Rob Austin Racing.
Duane said, It was great. I did taste a bite, and it was pretty good.
That's one word and it tells you everything you need to
The next reading of the bill is scheduled for early June.
Whether or not you go to church tomorrow.
Deuteronomy 28 v 1 -7 says clearly that if you are obedient to God, you won’t have to fight he said the enemy that comes against you in one way will flee before you in seven ways. In the name that is above every other name, from now on, all the enemies that stand up against you will be smitten by the Almighty God himself.
But this looks set to make some of those previous outings look like a CWA Bake Sale by comparison. GABS is the Great Australian Beer SpecTAPular and, as the name suggests, it will feature Australian Beers. And it will be Great. SpecTAPular, even.
When you do that you then have a reasoned and passionate approach, tempered to a hard core that will convince others that this is a worthwhile way to live and sustain society. Don't just protest: have the portfolio of investments and means to sustain your argument with you and the rationale for doing so. For any argument won purely on emotion can be lost just as easily to more emotion, and that is not the way to build society. The principle is excellent, but the execution has been on the ground of the enemy's choosing and it is time to stop doing that and choose a different set of venues and weapons to go with. Stop fighting defensively and go on the offensive in ways that cannot be countered easily.
In a mixing bowl using a hand held whisk, cream butter and sugar till pale and fluffy. Add salt, vanilla essence and whisk well.
thanks again!
Finally, after many many failed attempts, I ran out of resin, and had to buy a new batch of resin. This time, from a different manufacturer I found on etsy. I believe the reason why I was failing is because I measured my resin and hardener 1 to 1 ratio by weight rather than volume, thinking that it was more accurate. Turns out I was wrong.
Fasting. Alms giving. Prayer.
Effort is Important: In Dream High, effort is rewarded as much as talent, and often more so. Samdong doesn't get a dance solo, but he practices on his own at night anyway. He gets so good that when there's a vacancy, Jason's dance solo is given to Samdong because he stuck around and worked while the more gifted Jason flitted about and skipped practice.
Basically we can traverse these dimensions and rotate through them thereby expanding our perception beyond our condensed bubble like 3D. by reaching zero point we can transcend ourselves into other universes and the dimension that lie beyond.
Little Bird, Night Owl is my first step, and I hope an inspiration to you to take yours.
A genius, a madman and a poet.
In the mean time, I'm trying to boogie as much as possible. Dinners, book clubs, parties, you name it, I'm doin' it. I some how feel like my "free" life is going to end. Like, the baby will be this boss who will frown at me and send my social agenda to its room for a time out. An 18-yr time out.
I needed this book! Because I will admit - it is easy to load on the guilt - I am THE MASTER of that!! Don't get me wrong - I'm not about loading it onto others but I load that guilt right onto myself. So when I saw this blog tour I felt it was perfect for me. Turning Guilt Trips Into Joy Rides by Shirley Brosius, Janine Boyer and Kim Messinger is a book that highly encouraged me! This book is set up into 183 very short devotions - less than a page in length - but packed with thoughts that hit right to home. And each is followed by scripture or prayers to encourage you to get your focus on God - where it should be. I would recommend this book - it was easy to swallow and digest and PACKED with wisdom! We need that, as women, to be reminded that guilt is not necessary - let's live in grace!
8/23/05 From God The Father and Jesus The Christ, Our Lord and Savior - A Letter Given to Timothy, For All Those Who Have Ears to Hear
DH brought home some more Boulevard boxes so I can use the last of the black polka dot that I bought last week!
I love a good carbonara. I mean really, really love it. So much so that it was one of the last meals I ate as a single girl, before Matt and I got married. The saltiness of the pancetta, the prickle of pepper in the mouth, and the velvety way the egg just barely clings to the pasta - perfection!
9. No Safe Place by Richard North Patterson
I can strongly recommend it for anyone wanting to get an idea of religious Zionist approaches and thoughts both on the State of Israel as well as the Three Vows.
I loved the Bar Natasha location, but didn't honestly frequent it all that often. A beer sort of girl rarely finds herself in a martini and piano bar without a group setting. However, I can admit that I am excited that the cool spot will be reopening soon, as a larger variety of non-P&L watering holes in the Crossroads area just improves my quality of life. Work-life. Whatever.
of your heart
Here’s ‘Arcadia Louisiana Tea’, looking so much better than a couple of weeks ago. ‘Jaune Desprez’, a Noisette climber, is next to the arbor at left. He’s a very slow fellow. He’s been there two years and two months and is barely six feet tall. They say he’ll grow to 30 feet – someday.
Sergei Prokofiev’s score for Cinderella is one of his most endearing works, with beautiful memorable melodies and a sharp, world-wise humor. A fascination with childhood, its purity, wonder, and adventure are audibly evident, as well as the heightened realism of a 20th century populist master composer and orchestrator living through dark times.
if you have any feeling of hopelessness inside and you can’t seem to escape its infectious grip, cry. cry hard. cry as often as possible. wash it out of your system. and talk. to anybody you trust and truly love. it will help to set you free–eventually.
There's no point stocking the freezer if we forget what's in there- so keeping a well-organized freezer is essential. In fact, writing this post is making me run to my own freezer and clean it out and restock it. An empty freezer is not such a great thing either- freezers are most efficient when they are at least two-thirds full. Needless to say, overstuffing the freezer does nothing for efficiency.
Check it out!
was holding my left hand
I will.
The fair was wonderful, though. My favorite part was the baby cows in the Mooternity tent. We watched the wobbly little babies attempt to stand for the first time and it truly made my heart melt. I could watch them all day.
My inspiration for this card came from multiple challenges - I will be listing them all below.
There are several notable fortified towns in the heart of the Merchant's Republic. Wilksbury, at foot of the Irons Hills strategically overlooks the Via Imperium. Moresbury is situated on an Island in the midst of the Danúte River, and controls travel on the via Imperium through the lowlands of the Republic.
Phil 4:7
This guy looks altogether more suave: dark KlevereTien is the James Bond of Belgian winter ales (you can put that on the label, Hobbybrouwerij Het Nest, but I want credit). "Black and Strong" it says: the latter can't be argued with at 10% ABV, though it's more a red-brown than properly black. The head subsides quickly leaving just a ring of foam around the edge of a dark mirror surface which sparkles faintly.
Patterned Paper: StampinUp
Has this happened before?
Charm is deceptive, and beauty is fleeting, but a woman who fears the LORD
“For God hath concluded them all in unbelief, that he might have mercy upon all.”
The constitutional oath shall be as follows:
The mixture will make some foam, so try not to whisk it, just stir gently ...above you can see the clear golden liquid that results.
So last night, we started our new routine!
A Google search took me to the Wyoming Newspaper Project and I found a gold mine in those oil fields! It was purely on a lark that I typed in "Pecht" in the search engine and got more than 200 hits! And what hits they were! Every one one of these newspaper pages referenced the families of my great-grandfather, LeRoy (Roy) Pecht and his brother Albert Blair (A.B.) Pecht. I had downloaded more than 80 newspaper pages with articles about various family members before I finally called it quits for the day. I'll be back to finish up later!
We are just as likely to extrapolate realistically the feelings, problems and experiences of people living with technology that has not (yet) been invented as we are able to imagine what was said or thought in any period of early history.
If you order (a) certain product(s) AND ask for a gift wrapping or anything else “special”, it goes without saying, that those extras will be billed IN ADDITION to the product price.
I am glad I am able to do both, as I know my time doing these things are probably coming to an end. Next year I am skipping FDIC and Firehouse EXPO in order to take a more active role in the sports lives of my kids, and to take them to Disney World in the summer. I played a ton of sports as a kid and my Dad always coached me. This is something that I have always wanted to do but with our schedule it is difficult, and add in all the extra that I do makes it almost impossible so I am going to take a break from the “traveling circuit” in order to be more active in there lives. I am still going to the local training stuff that is offered around here, FDIC, Firehouse EXPO, and NFA are gonna have to take a bit of a back seat for a bit. I know this will not be my last FDIC, or Firehouse EXPO I love it too much to never go back but next year is already a no go for me, and the following year is already up for grabs.
And to the readers...let us all not forget we are also the authors, publishers, and retailers as well.
I noticed . . .
Here are some powerful speaking’s over your life, speak them and believe the unseen, (FAITH). Begin to say in any situation good or bad the following:
Obviously, she fails.
Fire/Water; Paper/Shears/Rock;
PUTRAJAYA, July 12 (Bernama) -- Seven public and 11 private institutions of higher learning (IPTs) have attained an excellent rating in the Rating System for Institutions of Higher Learning (Setara) 2009.
All of these things make for a strong church. When we fall short in one or in all of these areas, then we are not fulfilling what was intended for the Body of Christ as it fulfills its purpose in this world.
May we make wise choices today.
Hitting The Wall
and please expect posts of a more sufficiently nutricious nature next week. and more of the nitty grit of fashion.
photo by Heart of Oak
And this little beauty, in a reminder as I look out the kitchen window every morning and afternoon, that I am growing, learning, thankful and loving this journey..
And in the case of our daughters, it's about learning. We all experiment with language. Our speech rhythms and habits change over the course of our lifetimes. The societal rule that says kids don't get to experiment with profanity until they turn 18 or 21 or whatever is just silly. And unrealistic.
I become still, listening; the rustle of leaves,
Prepare a large skillet by coating it with cooking spray.
FH: I dislike snails intensely, they eat my plants and so I obliterate them from my patch, either by throwing them onto someone else’s garden or 'doing' for them with various preparations.
ME: You do that. @@
It was slow going to begin with and I don’t hold anything against you if you bailed early on, but it’s time to come back into the fold because the second half of Community’s season has been nothing short of fantastic. Community has been rattling around in my head almost daring me to define it. If I had to grab a couple of comparisons out of the air and slap them as labels on Community I’d go with The Simpsons and Spaced. Just as with Spaced, Community throws a ragtag team of stereotypes together but elevates them beyond their obvious stereotypes. Both shows like to play around with their character types while continuously stretching them.
Just So You Know... My grandmother wants to know why all television has to offer is, "Fat men jiggling their bellies?" Valid point granny. She also wants to know why the book she is reading has "Kiss" in the title but has no kisses in the book.
I am on holiday from today, the 6th April, returning on the 16. In my absence I have decided to publish some of my articles from the Expose Zionist Lies site, which I have lined up to auto-publish while I am away.
so, he went to work, and took his anxiety out on the trees.......
12-02 Frankfurt, Germany – Jahrhunderthalle
This little show has grown. Each show got a little better. Each show was a little different.
Tip Number Three - Use good quality embroidery floss and an embroidery hoop. Click here to watch video demonstrations of the hand embroidery stitches used in this pattern.
If your subordinate doesn’t know how to do a work, you can’t maintain all of them accountable for it. So you need to determine ability as soon as possible.
I'm still researching and reading up on the issue from both sides. I posted some preliminary information and thoughts here. Since then I have received several emails from educators across the nation on both sides of Common Core.
*Based on my risk factors, it's actually a very safe choice for me.
“But you are your body, you pushed him out,” was the confused response.
One may have entered one’s prayer closet at 3:30 AM. One may have praised the Lord with song, confessed one’s sins, thanked the Lord and prayed for a passage of scripture for today. One may have been led to Isaiah 57 – God will give His people new courage. Thank You Jesus!
Suede buttresses: buttes, metamorphic rocks,
Fax: 1-360-326-1747
The Challenge helped me focus on getting stuff sent out, gave me a bit of practice in terms of editing and trying to select the right stories to send to each competition. I discovered new markets and, as part of my research, read plenty of both good and bad stories. I feel like I've learned something from it all, even if I'm not 100% sure what it is yet, or how to use the new knowledge. Plus, I've now got a handful of stories that are nicely 'mature', ready to be tweaked and polished and sent out again.
neither young nor old
Akhee Ahn : I want to make changes in this country. Even if that would be a total chaos, I don't care. Oh, I mean, musical chaos. I don't want to violate national security law. Korean music is so boring today. We need another exciting musics. Not hipsters' meaningless self confession.
For myself, I'd qualify myself as a C.I.T. (couponita-in-training)! I wandered in the desert of paying full price for a while, believing it was too much time, effort, and energy for little pay-off. With a little incentive--and as many of us are one income families, that's incentive enough-- I have eased into couponing and CVSing.
The mirrored ceiling in the main bar is fantastic, especially the rather fab clock face. It is nice to see such a wide range of beers on the bar of any place. I often thought we were spoilt at the Cask with their range of pumps and kegs but here I think most people are catered for on the bar even without looking at the fridges behind the bar.
In Germany – where the economy in he past few years has performed a lot better than in most comparable nations – manufacturing has held up rather well since the early 2000s. But few Germans seem to understand fully why this has happened. Also the country as a whole is desperately seeking new policies and ideas aimed at ensuring this period of ascendancy continues.
There is more love.
Without further adieu, here are some cards I snagged in his cool draft.
The profile raises a lot of questions, and they turn back, in a way, to Atlantic Yards. Brooklyn, arena supporters say, needs a team to be major league, though Oklahoma City, which has a team, surely is no Brooklyn.
You make
Would it be OK if I asked you a few questions?
“The body appears to be largely self-motivated and independent, yet it actually responds only to the intentions of the mind.” -Dr. Helen Schucman, A Course in Miracles
I confessed to one of my friends yesterday that I missed the simpler, more thoughtless days. I was talking about matters of faith and ideas about God, but the fact is ,it is true about my entire life. You do not realize how much you are taking for granted until the rug is snatched out from under you.
Genre: YA Contemporary Fantasy
Wasted is now on two more shortlists - I can't say which ones but that's seven altogether! Hope my publishers are pleased. They haven't said so, but I'm assuming.
Hay to the bucks
This is the image of 90% of the Westerns you see on TV or in cinemas. The myth is so strong it has spawned Cowboy Fast Draw as a new sport, especially popular in states like Nevada and Arizona, where almost anybody can carry a loaded firearm. I had huge fun in May at the Genoa Cowboy Festival. I got to fire a revolver at targets with wax-filled cartridges. Anything under 1 second is considered good. The champions can draw, cock, fire and hit the target in under half a second.
Career Stats: 31 games, 57.6% Completion, 3,950 yards passing, 15 TD/20 INT, 71.6 Passer Rating
The story of the Old Testament is nothing if not a story of divine providence. On every page, in every promise, behind every prophecy is the sure hand of God. He sustains all things, directs all things, plans all things, ordains all things, superintends all things, works all things after the counsel of his will.
Probably not that, if I had to guess.
Another business venture that could prospectively put the environment in a state of vulnerability is off shore drilling. We all witnessed the lingering implications of the Gulf of Mexico oil spill disaster, which may take years for the ecosystem system and the gulf economy to fully recover. As a result, it is critical to examine the obligations that businesses have in regards to the environment before disasters inevitably occur. Without setting standards on an international basis, companies won’t have a frame of reference and may feel as though they have the ability to conduct business in whatever manner they see fit.
Again, follow the right people and companies on Twitter and you’ll never miss anything, ever again. Events, competitions, initiatives... it’s increasingly simple to stay abreast of this stuff. If you miss someone flagging up an ideal date for your calendar, then you can bet someone else will post/retweet about it later. Follow TV, radio and/or film production
Eryn popped her thumb out, yawned and stretched, completely unaware of our close brush with the sinister shadow of sepsis. Just as well. A six-year-old thumb-sucker might not have handled it as well as I had.
With a previous evening of pleading and praying for her body to heal, nothing was left but the defeated shell of her former self. Sadly, she could only reflect back a drawn, pale and exhausted look. Her once youthful appearance was now etched with deep lines marking her with the tale of chronic pain. With resignation and sadness, I turned away from the mirror, snapped off the light in the bathroom and hunkered down for the day realizing that today the pain had won and I had become a prisoner in my own home.
While yonder stone stands all alone
Asshole! After sending him two mails, three messages asking him to call me back, at least try to resolve the issue, if for nothing else to help me get closure. But no! The coward took the easy way out. No call, no mail, nothing. Just silence. Silence that has left me with more questions than before.
*I want things like this not to be acceptable or shrugged off. In a nutshell it might not seem like a big deal but in the bigger picture it simply leads to more sloppiness.It lends itself to the many things that are wrong with the world (think about not picking up the wrapper you just walked by because YOU didn't drop it there). Bad examples are set, a lack of caring is put forth and I think it goes hand in hand with morals and all that jazz. Where does it go before others think it is a BIG deal. Why not begin with an internal measure of how you want to be perceived or how you want the world to work? Sure, there are exceptions (lots of exceptions) and things don't always work out the way you want them to but to show a lack in caring or an obliviousness that the behavior is not normal is sad and startling. I liken this to the "good job" debate and children expecting gold stars at every turn, to employees expecting the highest rating on their reviews for simply doing their job and for internet sales people expecting 5 stars for sending you their product as they should. It's about treating people with kindness because you are kind. My thoughts are coming out very clear here and I understand that many of you will think me most snooty but these are the things I think about as I observe the discontent of the world around me.
All is Well is arranged in such a way to offer shifting relationships on its core themes of guilt, naivete vs. wisdom, death, love, and faith. There are three strands running through the album: the guilt theme cutting across "Wild Bill Jones", "Fall On My Knees", and "Prodigal Son", the romance theme stretching through "Sugar Baby", "Saro", "Wedding Dress", and "Little Satchel", and the inquiry into mortality at first abstractly marking "Little Johnny Brown" and then directly approached in "O Death" and "All is Well". It's as if with the progression of the record Amidon's narrators grow increasingly world-weary and knowing, or in other instances, such as in the approach to love, more juvenile. One can witness the palpable release of fear from the protagonist of "O Death" by the time he gets to "All is Well", in which the greeting of death, at least lyrically, suggests an awakening. Similarly, the knee-jerk gun-slinging of "Wild Bill Jones" in the event of heavy jealousy gives way obliquely to the devastating weight of guilt in "Prodigal Son", wherein Amidon again works with repetitious refrains ("I believe I'll go back home / acknowledge I done wrong") against a bouncy and plaintive fanfare of upright bass, french horn, clarinet, and strings.
The much awaited Apple iPad will find its designated place in the hands of its buyers tomorrow. Apple is unveiling the iPad in the market for sales. A tablet PC replete with all the updated features that would make one squint at the amount of information and data that could be accessed and processed by this small wonder is a marvel. The latest technological innovation by Apple is much vied for and also anticipated a lot.
In presentations Tuesday and Wednesday at the annual Society of Automotive Engineers World Congress, senior auto-industry executives in charge of technology strategy, research, and regulatory issues delivered the same message: Barring an unforeseen breakthrough that significantly drops the cost of automotive batteries, fully electric cars and plug-in hybrid vehicles are likely to remain confined to a niche of under 10% of the market through 2025 and beyond.
Wild Blette
The Long Run List
Have a FABULOUS day and a Blessed week :-)
When the Nazis did this, we hanged some of them for it, but New Scientist is now doing all sorts of whacked experiments on people to find the limits of human endurance. We’ll get lots of fascinating new data on physiology, all at the low, low cost of our souls. For example, did you know that you can die of lack of sleep? After about three months, apparently.
—Wiley and the Hairy Man, retold by Judy Sierra and illustrated by Brian Pinkney—it takes the smarts of both a swamp-dwelling boy and his mother to win out over the terrible Hairy Man in this tale from the Southern African-American tradition. There are other versions, including one illustrated by Molly Bang.
Last week I attended a friend’s show at a basement theater off of Times Square. It was a warm spring day and something inside told me to let my hair down and get a little crazy…so I ordered a virgin strawberry daiquiri. I have never had a virgin strawberry daiquiri before so I thought the bold taste that burned down my throat after my first sip was odd but probably normal. I set the drink in front of me and forgot about it for a while. After a bit I remembered how hot and thirsty I was and mindlessly downed half of my drink. That’s when I came to the conclusion that the burning was not a normal sensation for a virgin drink. My head wasn’t supposed to feel that hot, my ears certainly weren’t supposed to be on fire, my eyes were involuntarily wide and I couldn’t wipe that surprised expression off my face. I sent the drink back and continued the evening feeling warm and relaxed.
“So if the annular is damaged, if I understand you correctly, you can’t do the pressure tests in a reliable way?” Pelley asked.
While making Harlan County, U.S.A. Kopple surely must have felt a stronger connection to this tradition shared by the people she was standing beside every day, than to the documentary filmmaker traditions. In fact, she says outright on the Criterion commentary track, "I wasn't thinking about the tradition of documentary." Perhaps this is why, despite her experience with the Maysles from a few years earlier, Harlan County U.S.A. is not an example of Direct Cinema. It's true that certain techniques were shared, such as the size of the crew and the importance of capturing the authentic speech of the people seen on camera (in this case often using less-cumbersome wireless microphones). But the incorporation of archival footage, camera- address interviews, and non-diegetic music on the soundtrack, all ensure that the film is of a more hybridized form.
You shouldn’t fuck about with this kind of illness. It’s as simple as that. Now it could’ve been a coincidence, having an episode after I decided to play around with my meds. But I won’t be taking that chance again. It was stupid and the next episode might’ve been worse, could’ve put me back in hospital.
I'll let you know what I end up with!
(14) I am the good shepherd; and I know My sheep, and am known by My own. (15) As the Father knows Me, even so I know the Father; and I lay down My life for the sheep. (16) And other sheep I have which are not of this fold; them also I must bring, and they will hear My voice; and there will be one flock and one shepherd. (17) Therefore My Father loves Me, because I lay down My life that I may take it again. (18) No one takes it from Me, but I lay it down of Myself. I have power to lay it down, and I have power to take it again. This command I have received from My Father.” (John 10:7-18)
Mighty thumb.
Even though Roswell is moulting at the moment, he still manages to look very handsome.
For I am the LORD that bringeth you up out of the land of Egypt, to be your God: ye shall therefore be holy, for I am holy.
At this point you’re likely wondering why we’ve been staring at walls. Well, for the past two weeks we have been
Since 2008 I've made a conscious effort to stop all that. Files can be organized and stored on a hard drive. They can be easily retrieved when needed and I've never seen a brown ring stain from a coffee mug on any of these documents.
This is the 21st century and this is not the last time phones became of some use on the trip. One of my team members whipped out his smart phone and pulled up GPS. He was able to find a way back that would lead to a connecting road to keep us going in the right direction, and that’s what we did and it worked out perfectly.
It was so awful even the men were surreptitiously wiping away tears.
April 23rd…. The day I had been planning out for six months right from the insignificant clutch to the ultra expensive (strictly by my standards) saris … yes it was my wedding day!!
It's 4:30 in the morning...
The question is then…”Who will remove the shepherd from power?”
Duchamp also painted 16 visible cubes on one side with two hidden on the back, on the poster you will see next, scroll down and see if you can see what I see. This three dimensionalisation of each one of sixteen could relate according to the rules of the play chess surrealism, to each players 16 initial squares in the array at the beginning of the game. A cube for each piece even. All three dimensionalised. Its a nice poster for the chess tourney it advertises, that one almost feels attracted to look into the games of the tourney itself and and three dimensionalise them too as a surrealistic chess principle and elaboration of surrelist tradition surrealistically. Furthermore, in Duchamp’s three dimensionalisation perceived in this way as ive mentioned here, one could add the factor of the impossibility of the actuality of the actual story, about their creation being slightly off tangent to the actual reality of its creation, as it stands on the poster, or vice versa, the reality of its creation is off tangent with how it was said to be made! The story that Duchamp created this piece of chess surrealistic painting from a photograph of actual falling cubes onto a net is not born out the precise reality of recent actual tests and mathematics using various software programmes and mathematical wisdom of what is and what not is an actual externalisation of photographic reality. Perhaps Duchamp mean to tell us something here, about the impossible object, the cubes being actual copies of actual photographs of actual ones. This applied to chess in this poster, well it certainly tells us this anyway, even if this was unintended by Duchamp..this applied to chess can teach us not al is what is on the board, not all is what it seems, and what is real, the creations or the creations own dream? Reality if off tangent to what is considered as reality and vice versa, and the tumbling and falling externalise chess squares of initial array, falling into grid pattern net can be idealised and transformed into a work of art where the impossible becomes possible upon another level. The two hidden squares make a calculation, 2 x 16 = 32, each player, 2, has 16 pieces each. Of course we may surmise other invisible cubes behind too, but if one observes one will see only two are hidden with a small part if them showing. We can also seee in this an association with the cube and chess, and I would like to also mention I have wrote on this elsewhere in this blog concerning the Jesus and Mary cubes and their numerical features.
But of course, like every other human, his decisions weren’t all great. In the 1980s he hired John Sculley to succeed himself as CEO of Apple, and Sculley presided over a period of slow growth and product missteps in the ensuing years. Jobs commented about Sculley: “What can I say? I hired the wrong guy. He destroyed everything I spent 10 years working for, starting with me.” Jobs’ major startup during his hiatus from Apple, NeXT Computer, was largely unsuccessful — at least in the hardware business. His decision to sell all of his Apple stock when Sculley pushed him out cost him billions. And when he came back as CEO, he allowed the backdating of stock options.
It's really hard not to be judgemental. To not believe that I am doing it the right way and other people aren't quite there yet.
Nuha Mohammed Al-Doaifi was arrested in Palm Bay after police responded to a 911 call, Florida Today reported Tuesday.
And the Winner Is: Deborah! her comment was:
I have decided to do quite a lot of hand quilting on this quilt. Lucky I enjoy it so much!
When a person takes an oath (or affirmation) before giving testimony, he is assuming the role of an official, that of "witness under oath", for the duration of his testimony. That official position entails a special obligation to tell the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth, and in that capacity, one is punishable in a way he would not be as an ordinary person not under oath. Therefore, perjury is a high crime.
When my lil Mikay comes home soon we are going to take a family trip to the grocery store to stock up on more groceries! I just love going grocery shopping, don't you?!
BoBunny Alissa Collection
As it turned out, apparently good but it was not to my liking in flavours, I remembered them as being moist but to me they were dry, but they received compliments and they disappeared quickly.
Anyway, I'm finishing my second year.
’vyakto ’vyaktāt sanātanaḥ
Next - let's cast our minds back to the European tribal war of the 90s - aka the breakup of Yugoslavia. We have forgotten how NATO planes bombed Serbian targets in the Spring of 1999, even though it was pretty controversial at the time. No wonder. The bombing struck at Serbia not just militarily, but hit a good many civilian targets. The campaign was supposed to protect the Kosovo non-Serbs from the Serbs and (Tony Blair's words) "prevent an impending humanitarian disaster".
Her ears were deaf with mockery thus she savors the lines that say she is special.
And after food is hungrier than before.
But they will not follow a stranger;
The bus trip wasn't brilliant, to be honest. It was quite interesting, but Maja and Marina sensibly cut things short after lunch. Wink and I didn't, and wished we had when we discovered we had to walk a kilometre to an ashram (and another one back again) in the heat of the day when we'd already walked a lot. We opted to stay on the bus. Or rather I did, I read, Wink went and talked to a group of children playing cricket.
Whew! My little Squeaky Burrito has decided to space out his feedings to every 2 hours today, and take naps in between. I can write another post! Woohoo!
- 1 bay leaf (or more)
He’s a sweetheart, isn’t he? Full of wise words and humility… Samir, you get abuse from Arsenal fans because you are nothing more than a mercenary. Your hollow words that attempt to portray you otherwise are as transparent as glass. Have you asked yourself why Gooners don’t boo Kolo Toure or Gael Clichy? It’s simple; they contributed more than 3 months, and neither left with the attitude and continuing disrespect you have.
We measured the egg whites and butter and combined the cream and chocolate…
fish tail die from My Favorite Things, Spellbinders die
My parachute won't work ? ? ?
“…Mobility work is not even remotely close to being considered a warm-up! If you are not sweating before you pick up your kettle bell, shake weight etc? You did it wrong!”
Rating: Yay!
